[]



WHAT PEOPLE ARE SAYING ABOUT



KILL ALL NORMIES


Amidst the chaos of our times, it is a relief to have a brilliant and
fearless critic like Angela Nagle to turn to. Unwilling to stomach the
liberal shibboleths that fail to adequately explain the emergence and
significance of right-wing subculture, she’s the only one willing to
descend into the grimiest of Internet grottos and give us the benefit of
her incisive and cool-headed analysis. (And thank god too, because I’m
sure as hell not doing it.)

AMBER A’LEE FROST, Chapo Trap House

Angela Nagle is one of the few writers anywhere who has consistently
refused to hold a double standard for virulent racism and misogyny even
when it came in edgy countercultural packaging. Kill All Normies is a
brilliant exposé of the new faces of online nihilism and fascism, which
can no longer be explained away as doing it “for the lulz”.

DAVID GOLUMBIA, Author of _The Politics of Bitcoin: Software as
Right-Wing Extremism_

With a liberal left dangerously lost in the stormy waters of middle
class self-flagellation, Angela Nagle is the lighthouse keeper showing
us the way out. Her writing is unsparing in its diagnosis but never
cruel. Unlike much of the Left who’ve grown far too accustomed to
marginalization and defeat, Nagle still believes in politics as the only
way of changing an increasingly brutal world. She is the writer and
social critic I’ve been waiting for.

CONNOR KILPATRICK, _Jacobin_ magazine

[]

First published by Zero Books, 2017

Zero Books is an imprint of John Hunt Publishing Ltd., Laurel House,
Station Approach,

Alresford, Hants, SO24 9JH, UK

office1@jhpbooks.net

www.johnhuntpublishing.com

www.zero-books.net

For distributor details and how to order please visit the ‘Ordering’
section on our website.

Text copyright: Angela Nagle 2017

ISBN: 978 1 78535 543 1

978 1 78535 544 8 (ebook)

Library of Congress Control Number: 2017934035

All rights reserved. Except for brief quotations in critical articles or
reviews, no part of this book may be reproduced in any manner without
prior written permission from the publishers.

The rights of Angela Nagle as author have been asserted in accordance
with the Copyright, Designs and Patents Act 1988.

A CIP catalogue record for this book is available from the British
Library.

Design: Stuart Davies

Printed and bound by CPI Group (UK) Ltd, Croydon, CR0 4YY, UK

We operate a distinctive and ethical publishing philosophy in all areas
of our business, from our global network of authors to production and
worldwide distribution.



CONTENTS


Introduction: From Hope to Harambe

Chapter One: The leaderless digital counter-revolution

Chapter Two: The online politics of transgression

Chapter Three: Gramscians of the alt-light

Chapter Four: Conservative culture wars from Buchanan to Yiannopoulos

Chapter Five: From Tumblr to the campus wars: creating scarcity in an
online economy of virtue

Chapter Six: Entering the manosphere

Chapter Seven: Basic bitches, normies and the lamestream

Conclusion: That joke isn’t funny anymore – the culture war goes offline



INTRODUCTION



FROM HOPE TO HARAMBE


In the lead-up to the election of Barack Obama in 2008, his message of
hope was publicly and with great earnestness shared by vast numbers of
liberals online, eager to show their love for the first black president,
ecstatic to be part of what felt like a positive mass-cultural moment.
After George W. Bush, who had waged wars in Iraq and Afghanistan, and
embarrassed educated people with his Southern style, and his regular
gaffs and grammatical mistakes or ‘Bushisms’, the feeling of shame among
US liberals was captured at the time by books like Michael Moore’s
_Stupid White Men_.

In stark contrast Obama was articulate, sophisticated, erudite and
cosmopolitan. In the media spectacle of his election Oprah cried,
Beyoncé sang and crowds of young, adoring fans rejoiced. Even some of
the icy hearts of those significantly to the left of the Democratic
Party were temporarily melted in what felt like a mass outpouring of
positivity and hope, an egalitarian dream realized.

Hillary Clinton tried to repeat this formula in 2016 by dancing on _The
Ellen DeGeneres Show_, drafting in Beyoncé once again, assuring
listeners of her penchant for hot sauce and attracting feminist
celebrities like Lena Dunham with the ‘I’m With Her’ slogan. However,
instead, she became a source of comedy and ridicule among large online
audiences from right across the political spectrum. When she solemnly
condemned a new Internet age right-wing movement as part of Trump’s
‘basket of deplorables’, the massed online ranks of the target of her
comments collectively erupted in memes, mockery and celebration.

How did we get from those earnest hopeful days broadcast across the
media mainstream to where we are now? This book covers this period from
the perspective of Internet-culture and subcultures, tracing the online
culture wars that have raged on below the line and below the radar of
mainstream media throughout the period over feminism, sexuality, gender
identity, racism, free speech and political correctness. This was unlike
the culture wars of the 60s or the 90s, in which a typically older age
cohort of moral and cultural conservatives fought against a tide of
cultural secularization and liberalism among the young. This online
backlash was able to mobilize a strange vanguard of teenage gamers,
pseudonymous swastika-posting anime lovers, ironic _South Park_
conservatives, anti-feminist pranksters, nerdish harassers and
meme-making trolls whose dark humor and love of transgression for its
own sake made it hard to know what political views were genuinely held
and what were merely, as they used to say, for the lulz. What seemed to
hold them all together in their obscurity was a love of mocking the
earnestness and moral self-flattery of what felt like a tired liberal
intellectual conformity running right through from establishment liberal
politics to the more militant enforcers of new sensitivities from the
wackiest corners of Tumblr to campus politics.

Through this period we can also see the death of what remained of a mass
culture sensibility, in which there was still a mainstream media arena
and a mainstream sense of culture and the public. The triumph of the
Trumpians was also a win in the war against this mainstream media, which
is now held in contempt by many average voters and the weird irony-laden
Internet subcultures from right and left, who equally set themselves
apart from this hated mainstream. It is a career disaster now to signal
your left-behind cluelessness as a basic bitch, a normie or a member of
the corrupt media mainstream in any way. Instead, we see online the
emergence of a new kind of anti-establishment sensibility expressing
itself in the kind of DIY culture of memes and user-generated content
that cyberutopian true believers have evangelized about for many years
but had not imagined taking on this particular political form.

Compare the first election won by Obama, in which social media devotees
reproduced the iconic but official blue-and-red stylized stencil
portrait of the new president with HOPE printed across the bottom, a
portrait created by artist Shepard Fairey and approved by the official
Obama campaign, to the bursting forth of irreverent mainstream-baffling
meme culture during the last race, in which the Bernie Sanders Dank Meme
Stash Facebook page and The Donald subreddit defined the tone of the
race for a young and newly politicized generation, with the mainstream
media desperately trying to catch up with a subcultural in-joke style to
suit two emergent anti-establishment waves of the right and left.
Writers like Manuel Castells and numerous commentators in the _Wired_
magazine milieu told us of the coming of a networked society, in which
old hierarchical models of business and culture would be replaced by the
wisdom of crowds, the swarm, the hive mind, citizen journalism and
user-generated content. They got their wish, but it’s not quite the
utopian vision they were hoping for.

As old media dies, gatekeepers of cultural sensibilities and etiquette
have been overthrown, notions of popular taste maintained by a small
creative class are now perpetually outpaced by viral online content from
obscure sources, and culture industry consumers have been replaced by
constantly online, instant content producers. The year 2016 may be
remembered as the year the media mainstream’s hold over formal politics
died. A thousand Trump Pepe memes bloomed and a strongman
larger-than-life Twitter troll who showed open hostility to the
mainstream media and to both party establishments took The White House
without them.

One of the early significant moments of rupture in mainstream
Internet-culture sensibilities was the viral Kony 2012 video. You can
map a trajectory through the dominant styles from virtue to cynical
inscrutable irony, roughly from _Kony 2012_ to the Harambe meme
explosion in 2016. The _Kony 2012_ film’s purpose was to promote the
charity campaign Stop Kony, which itself aimed to have the Ugandan
militia leader Joseph Kony arrested by the end of 2012. The film
received over 100 million views and went so viral that one poll
suggested half of young adult Americans heard about it in the days
following the video’s release, causing its website to crash. _TIME_
magazine called it the most viral video ever made. On Facebook and
Twitter, a vast audience of Western young people normally pretty
indifferent to the activities of Ugandan war criminals shared the video,
with urgent emotional exclamations attached, which we might now
cynically call ‘virtue signaling’.

But then the video and the campaign started to come under criticism from
Ugandans, experts on the region, and even their Head of State.
Denunciations of the video began to pour in for its crass
oversimplification, inaccuracy, emotional manipulation and ‘slacktivism’
– a now common pejorative also called ‘clicktivism’. A mass screening of
the film in Uganda was met with jeering and hostility, as viewers were
angered that the film was focused on the US filmmaker, while neglecting
Kony’s victims. Western critics eager for shares of righteous approval
rushed to expose the insufficient virtue of _Kony 2012_ and its
mainstream supporters.

Then, still at the height of the video’s viral fame, Jason Russell, the
filmmaker, was arrested and detained for psychiatric evaluation after
his public breakdown was filmed and released online. This became yet
another viral video in which he could be seen outdoors naked and
shouting, hitting the ground, masturbating and vandalizing cars.

At a dizzying pace, the Kony story had run a now familiar course from
mainstream virtue to competitive virtue hot takes to disgrace to
_Schadenfreude_, which would become a standard plot of dark online
spectacles in the years that followed. Many of those who had shared the
video in the spirit of global goodwill were sheepishly taking it down.
Earnest, feel-good, easily shared concern had been replaced in a matter
of days with the darkest side of the return of a more native,
pre-monetized, anonymous Internet-culture – _Schadenfreude_, deep
cynicism and the now unstoppable force of public humiliation as viral
entertainment.

By 2016, after countless repeats of the _Kony 2012_ cycle from virtue to
disgrace, a spirit of deep nihilistic cynicism and reactive irony
bubbled up to the surface of mainstream Internet-culture and an absurd
in-jokey forum humor became dominant. When a gorilla named Harambe was
shot dead at the Cincinnati Zoo that year after a child fell into his
enclosure, the usual cycles of public displays of outrage online began
as expected with inevitable competitive virtue signaling. At first,
emotional and outraged people online blamed the child’s parents for the
gorilla’s death, with some even petitioning to have the parents
prosecuted for their neglect. But then a kind of giddy ironic mocking of
the social media spectacle started to take over. The Harambe meme soon
became the perfect parody of the sentimentality and absurd priorities of
Western liberal performative politics and the online mass hysteria that
often characterized it.

On the same day that a post about the incident reached the front page of
Reddit news, a petition titled ‘Justice for Harambe’ was created on
Change.org, which called for authorities to hold the child’s parents
responsible for Harambe’s death, gaining hundreds of thousands of
signatures. Soon, the mostly ironically used hashtags #JusticeForHarambe
and #RIPHarambe began circulating. Song parodies with Harambe inserted
into the lyrics were created, and the call to arms ‘Dicks Out For
Harambe’ was quickly turned into a popular expression by comedian
Brandon Wardell.

Harambe began appearing in tongue-in-cheek sentimental portraits of
beloved celebrities who had died in 2016, like David Bowie and Prince.
One US high school student in a gorilla costume was filmed running along
the sidelines at his school’s first football game of the season,
dragging another student behind him like the little boy in the enclosure
before Harambe was shot. The Zoo pleaded with the meme-makers to stop
using Harambe hashtags, and bombarding them with tweets and messages.
The memes spread to mainstream media, when a young man holding a ‘Bush
Did Harambe’ sign, a reference also to the 9/11 ‘truther’ conspiracy,
appeared on MSNBC live outside the Democratic National Convention.

Matt Christman from the podcast Chapo Trap House, itself a knowing
product of contemporary irony-saturated online culture, unsentimentally
but accurately summed it up saying: ‘the popularity of Harambe jokes
proves that people want to laugh about murder but feel bad about it.’
Christman also noted on one podcast that Harambe mania really took off
after the Orlando nightclub massacre in a gay club, carried out by a
shooter pledging allegiance to ISIS.

Responding to highly mediated tragedies with insensitive pranking and
irony had been a staple of online trolling cultures for many years
before, but Harambe was the first case attracting such large numbers of
people online wanting to get in on the in-joke. It went viral too,
because it hit at a time when a particular style of humorless,
self-righteous, right-on social media sentimentality had already reached
such an absurd peak that the once obscure style of ironic cynical
mockery also emerged into more mainstream Internet-culture as a
counterforce.

Although it worked as a brilliantly absurd parody, and was embraced by
ironists from left to right, what came to complicate the detached humor
is that, as in so many other similar cases, it also allowed cover for
genuinely sinister things to hide amid the maze of irony. For example,
Harambe was referenced by harassers in the hate campaign led against
_Ghostbusters_ star Leslie Jones, with largely anonymous threats and
comparisons of her to the gorilla. This barrage of abuse came her way
after Milo Yiannopoulos, the English gay conservative turned alt-light
celebrity, tweeted a series of insults at her and said, among other
things, that she looked like ‘a black dude’. The harassment campaign
against her for finding herself in Milo’s firing line led to, among
other things, her website being hacked and nude photos of her being
circulated online.

Given the Harambe meme became a favorite of alt-right abusers, was it
then just old-fashioned racism dressed up as Internet-savvy satire, as
it appealed most to those seeking to mock liberal sensitivities? Or was
it a clever parody of the inane hysteria and faux-politics of liberal
Internet-culture? Do those involved in such memes any longer know what
motivated them and if they themselves are being ironic or not? Is it
possible that they are both ironic parodists and earnest actors in a
media phenomenon at the same time?

A hacker who goes by the Twitter handle @prom hacked into the account of
Cincinnati Zoo director Thane Maynard tweeting #DicksOutForHarambe from
his account. When asked about his motivations, though, he told the _New
York Daily News_ he was ‘not sure’ why he hacked Maynard’s account,
saying: ‘At the time when it actually happened I was kinda angry at the
dude who shot him.’

It was amid this ironical in-jokey maze of meaning that the online
culture wars played out, that Trump got elected and that what we now
call the alt-right came to prominence. Every bizarre event, new identity
and strange subcultural behavior that baffles general audiences when
they eventually make the mainstream media, from otherkin to far right
Pepe memes, can be understood as a response to a response to a response,
each one responding angrily to the existence of the other. Trumpian
meme-makers ramped up their taboo-breaking anti-PC style in response to
gender-bending Tumblr users, who themselves then became more sensitive,
more convinced of the racism, misogyny and hetero-normative oppression
of the world outside of their online subcultures. At the same time, the
‘deplorables’, from the Trumpian trolls to the alt-right, view the
Hillary loyalists – the entrenched identity politics of Tumblr and the
intersectional anti-free speech campus left – as evidence of their
equally bleak view of a rapidly declining Western civilization, as both
sides have become increasingly unmoored to any cultural mainstream,
which scarcely resembles either bleak vision.

The once obscure call-out culture of the left emanating from
Tumblr-style campus-based identity politics reached its peak during this
period, in which everything from eating noodles to reading Shakespeare
was declared ‘problematic’, and even the most mundane acts ‘misogynist’
and ‘white supremacist’. While taboo and anti-moral ideologies festered
in the dark corners of the anonymous Internet, the de-anonymized social
media platforms, where most young people now develop their political
ideas for the first time, became a panopticon, in which the many lived
in fear of observation from the eagle eye of an offended organizer of
public shaming. At the height of its power, the dreaded call-out, no
matter how minor the transgression or how well intentioned the
transgressor, could ruin your reputation, your job or your life. The
particular incarnations of the online left and right that exist today
are undoubtedly a product of this strange period of ultra puritanism.
These obscure online political beginnings became formative for a whole
generation, and impacted mainstream sensibilities and even language.

The hysterical liberal call-out produced a breeding ground for an online
backlash of irreverent mockery and anti-PC, typified by charismatic
figures like Milo. But after crying wolf throughout these years, calling
everyone from saccharine pop stars to Justin Trudeau a ‘white
supremacist’ and everyone who wasn’t With Her a sexist, the real wolf
eventually arrived, in the form of the openly white nationalist
alt-right who hid among an online army of ironic in-jokey trolls. When
this happened, nobody knew who to take literally anymore, including many
of those in the middle of this new online far right themselves. The
alt-light figures that became celebrities during this period made their
careers exposing the absurdities of online identity politics and the
culture of lightly thrown claims of misogyny, racism, ableism,
fatphobia, transphobia and so on. However, offline, only one side saw
their guy take the office of US president and only one side has in their
midst faux-ironic _Sieg Heil_ saluting, open white segregationists and
genuinely hate-filled, occasionally murderous, misogynists and racists.

Before the overtly racist alt-right were widely known, the more
mainstream alt-light largely flattered it, gave it glowing write-ups in
_Breitbart_ and elsewhere, had its spokespeople on their YouTube shows
and promoted it on social media. Nevertheless, when Milo’s sudden career
implosion happened later they didn’t return the favor, which I think may
be setting a precedent for a future in which the playfully transgressive
alt-light unwittingly play the useful idiots for those with much more
serious political aims. If this dark, anti-Semitic, race segregationist
ideology grows in the coming years, with their vision of the future that
would necessitate violence, those who made the right attractive will
have to take responsibility for having played their role.

This book is an attempt to map the online culture wars that formed the
political sensibilities of a generation, to understand and to keep an
account of the online battles that may otherwise be forgotten but have
nevertheless shaped culture and ideas in a profound way from tiny
obscure subcultural beginnings to mainstream public and political life
in recent years. It will place contemporary culture wars in some
historical context and attempt to untangle the real from the
performance, the material from the abstract and the ironic from the
faux-ironic, if such a thing is any longer possible.



CHAPTER ONE



THE LEADERLESS DIGITAL COUNTER-REVOLUTION


It is worth thinking back now to the early 2010s, when cyberutopianism
had its biggest resurgence since the 90s, before the dot-com bubble
burst. This time it emerged in response to a series of political events
around the world from the Arab Spring to the Occupy movement to new
politicized hacker movements. Anonymous, Wikileaks and public-square
mass protests in Spain and across the Middle East were getting huge
coverage in the news, causing a flurry of opinion and analysis pieces
about their profound significance. All of these events were being
attributed to the rise of social media and characterized as a new
leaderless form of digital revolution. The hyperbole and hubris of the
moment should have been enough to make anyone skeptical, but most on the
left were swept up in the excitement as images of vast crowds in public
squares appeared on social media and then in the mainstream media.

Books, social media and countless gushing columns and blogs celebrated
the arrival of what cyberutopians of the early Internet had long
prophesized. To pick one typical example of the tone at the time, in
Heather Brooke’s paean _The Revolution Will be Digitized: Dispatches
from the information war_ she claimed, ‘Technology is breaking down
traditional social barriers of status, class, power, wealth and
geography, replacing them with an ethos of collaboration and
transparency.’ _Adbusters_, the Canadian anti-consumerist magazine,
published a widely shared article by Manuel Castells called ‘The Disgust
Becomes a Network’ when leaderless encampments, organized online,
started to appear in Spain and around the world. He argued that what he
had been writing about for most of his career – the networked society –
had taken a radical new form. BBC journalist Paul Mason wrote _Why It’s
Kicking Off Everywhere_, documenting the revolutionaries in Tahrir
Square, the Iranian ‘Twitter revolution’ and the heavily hashtagged
Occupy Wall Street protests that spread around the world.

But this fervor died down in just a few short years. The Egyptian
revolution led to something worse – the rule of the Muslim Brotherhood.
Islamists ran riot in the streets and stories of rapes in the very
public square that had shortly before held so much hope came to light.
Soon the military dictatorship swept back into power. The Occupy Wall
Street demonstrators remained literally aimless and were eventually
forced out of public property by police, camp by camp. By the end of
2013, a public-square style movement took place in Ukraine, which
started with many of the same scenes of romanticized people-power in the
public square. However this time the leaderless network narrative, which
was already starting to look a little less convincing, was left aside
because the protests quickly erupted into fascist mob rule.

In many of the events that _were_ considered part of the leaderless
digital revolution narrative, like Occupy Wall Street and the
public-square protests in Spain, in which thousands occupied the Puerta
del Sol, the Guy Fawkes mask was adopted as a central symbol. But the
online origins of the mask and the politically fungible sensibilities
that can be traced back through the mask should have offered a clue that
another very different variety of leaderless online movement had
potential to brew.

After the election of Trump, everyone wanted to know about a new online
right-wing movement whose memetic aesthetics seemed to have infiltrated
sites from the popular The Donald subreddit to mainstream
Internet-culture. In the lead-up to the election, the most famous common
imagery was of Pepe the Frog. The name given by the press to this mix of
rightist online phenomena including everything from Milo to 4chan to
neo-Nazi sites was the ‘alt-right’. In its strictest definition though,
as an army of Internet pedants quickly pointed out, the alt-right term
was used in its own online circles to include only a new wave of overtly
white segregationist and white nationalist movements and subcultures,
typified by spokespeople like Richard Spencer, who has called for a US
white ethno-state and a pan-national white Empire modeled on some
approximation of the Roman Empire. The movement’s media also includes
Scottish video blogger Millennial Woes, Red Ice, sites like Radix and
the long-form and book publishers Counter Currents.

In the broader orbit of the alt-right, made up of often warring and
sectarian factions, there is an older generation of white advocates who
pre-date the alt-right but who the alt-right reads and draws influence
from, like Jared Taylor from the site American Renaissance who refers to
himself as a ‘race realist’ and figures like Kevin B. MacDonald, editor
of Occidental Observer, described by the Anti-Defamation League as a
primary voice of anti-Semitism for far-right intellectuals. The
alt-right is, to varying degrees, preoccupied with IQ, European
demographic and civilizational decline, cultural decadence, cultural
Marxism, anti-egalitarianism and Islamification but most importantly, as
the name suggests, with creating an alternative to the right-wing
conservative establishment, who they dismiss as ‘cuckservatives’ for
their soft Christian passivity and for metaphorically cuckholding their
womenfolk/nation/race to the non-white foreign invader.

Then there is a range of more obscure rightist anti-egalitarian
reactionary tendencies like the earlier neoreaction movement or NRx,
which includes thinkers and bloggers like Mencius Moldbug and Nick Land,
creators of the influential ideas of ‘the Cathedral’ and the latter the
‘Dark Enlightenment’. The idea of the Cathedral closely resembles
Marxian critical theory’s understanding of ideology, as an
all-encompassing system and prison of the mind. The Dark Enlightenment
is an ironic play on the idea of the Enlightenment, based on a suspicion
of progress and rejecting the liberal paradigm. Among all alt-right
thinkers Land is the greatest misfit, once closer to the radical
Accelerationist school of thought and still a highly idiosyncratic
thinker, he is not so easily categorized. Within the radical right
libertarian pro-tech tendency, common preoccupations include Bitcoin,
Seasteading – Peter Theil’s idea to create a separate state off the
coast of the US – and rightist elite applications of transhumanism.

But of course what we call the alt-right today could never have had any
connection to the mainstream and to a new generation of young people if
it only came in the form of lengthy treatises on obscure blogs. It was
the image- and humor-based culture of the irreverent meme factory of
4chan and later 8chan that gave the alt-right its youthful energy, with
its transgression and hacker tactics. The Guy Fawkes mask used in the
protests in 2011 was a reference to Anonymous, which took its name,
leaderless anti-celebrity ethic and networked style from the chaotic
anonymous style of 4chan. V for Vendetta, which the Guy Fawkes mask is
taken from, and the ‘dark age of comic books’ influenced the aesthetic
sensibilities of this broad online culture.

While commentators praised the rejection of the right-left divide among
a new wave of Internet-centric protest in the early 2010s, the political
rootlessness of this networked, leaderless Internet-centric politics now
seems a little less worthy of uncritical celebration. Anonymous
activities have over the years leaned incoherently to the libertarian
left and right, and everything in between, singling out everyone from
Justin Bieber fans to feminists, fascists, cybersecurity specialists,
and engaged in the kind of pervert-exposing vigilantism that blue-collar
tabloid readers have long been mocked for.

To understand the seemingly contradictory politics of 4chan, Anonymous
and its relationship to the alt-right, it is important to remember that
the gradual right-wing turn in chan culture centered around the politics
board /pol/, as compared to the less overtly political but always
extreme ‘random’ board /b/. Along the way left-leaning ‘moral fags’ who
had gravitated towards AnonOps IRCs suffered from a degree of state
spying and repression during the height of Anonymous’s public profile
from around 2010 to 2012. This absence of the more libertarian
left-leaning element within chan culture created a vacuum in the image
boards that the rightist side of the culture was able to fill with their
expert style of anti-PC shock humor memes.

4chan began with users sharing Japanese anime, created by a teenage
Chris Poole (aka moot) and based on the anime-sharing site 2chan.
Poole’s main influence for the style of the site was inspired by a
Something Awful subforum known as the Anime Death Tentacle Rape
Whorehouse. It was set up in October 2003 and by 2011, it grew to around
750 million page views a month. New users were called newfags and older
users oldfags. It became a massively influential and creative forum
known for pranks, memes and images that ‘cannot be unseen’. The culture
of the site was not only deeply and shockingly misogynist, but also
self-deprecating in its own self-mockery of nerdish ‘beta’ male
identity. Cultural touchstones included war-based video games and films
like _Fight Club_ and _The Matrix_. There was no registration or login
required, so posts were typically all under the username ‘Anonymous’.

This culture of anonymity fostered an environment where the users went
to air their darkest thoughts. Weird pornography, in-jokes, nerdish
argot, gory images, suicidal, murderous and incestuous thoughts, racism
and misogyny were characteristic of the environment created by this
strange virtual experiment, but it was mostly funny memes. Poole has
called 4chan a ‘meme factory’ and it undoubtedly created countless memes
that made their way into mainstream Internet-culture. The most famous
early examples of these were probably LOLcats, a cat-picture based style
of image macro, and rickrolling, the use of a link to seemingly serious
content that sends its user to a video of Rick Astley singing _Never
Gonna Give You Up_.

The users of 4chan/b/ acted collectively on things like making Chris
Poole person of the year in Time magazine’s online poll in 2008 and the
collective cyber bullying of a random 11-year-old, Jessie Slaughter, in
2010. They got hold of her name and address, harassed her and encouraged
her to commit suicide after she made a silly video of herself speaking
in gangsta-rap style. Her situation was, unsurprisingly, not improved by
her father posting a video in defence of his upset daughter, in which he
threatened to call the ‘cyberpolice’. In their emotionally
underdeveloped way, lack of Internet-culture knowledge is always license
on 4chan for any level of cruelty. They also acted collectively on less
sinister pranks like Operation Birthday Boy, when an elderly man posted
an online ad saying: ‘people wanted for birthday party’. Touched by the
lonely old man’s appeal, they found his name, address and phone number,
and sent him hundreds of birthday cards, and orders of cake and
strippers.

In the _New York Times_, Mattathias Schwartz described 4chan/b/ like
this:

The anonymous denizens of 4chan’s other boards — devoted to travel,
fitness and several genres of pornography — refer to the /b/-dwellers as
“/b/tards.” Measured in terms of depravity, insularity and
traffic-driven turnover, the culture of /b/ has little precedent. /b/
reads like the inside of a high-school bathroom stall, or an obscene
telephone party line, or a blog with no posts and all comments filled
with slang that you are too old to understand.

A common reference on the alt-right ‘kek’ started on 4chan and
translated to ‘lol’ in comment boards on the multiplayer videogame
_World of Warcraft_, while Pepe the Frog, originating in Matt Furie’s
Web comic _Boy’s Club_, epitomizes online in-joke meme humor. Kek is
also an ancient Egyptian deity represented as a frog-headed man while
‘the Church of Kek’ and ‘praise Kek’ refer to their ironic religion.

One of the things that linked the often nihilistic and ironic chan
culture to a wider culture of the alt-right orbit was their opposition
to political correctness, feminism, multiculturalism, etc., and its
encroachment into their freewheeling world of anonymity and tech. In the
US, one of the early cases of orchestrated attacks against such
encroaching women was aimed at Kathy Sierra, a tech blogger and
journalist. Sierra had been the keynote speaker at South by Southwest
Interactive and her books were top sellers. The backlash against her was
sparked when she supported a call to moderate reader comments, which at
the time was seen as undermining the libertarian hacker ethic of
absolute Internet freedom, although it has since become standard.
Commenters on her blog began harassing and threatening her en mass,
making the now routine rape and death threats received by women like
Sierra. Personal details about her family and home address were posted
online and hateful responses included photoshopped images of her with a
noose beside her head, a shooting target pointed at her face and a
creepy image of her being gagged with women’s underwear. The
personalized backlash against her was so extreme that she felt she had
to close down her blog and withdraw from speaking engagements. When she
explained on her blog why she had to step back from public life, writing
that she was terrified that her stalkers might go through with their
threats, it sparked a whole new wave of geek hatred against her.

Andrew Auernheimer (aka weev), a now well-known hacker and troll, seems
to have been heavily involved in the attacks against Sierra, spreading
false information online about her being a battered wife and a former
prostitute. In 2009, weev claimed to have hacked into Amazon’s system
and reclassified books about homosexuality as porn. Once a part of the
Occupy movement, he now regularly posts anti-Semitic and anti-gay rants
on YouTube, has a swastika tattoo on his chest and was also the
self-appointed president of a trolling initiative called the Gay Nigger
Association of America. This was dedicated to opposing popular blogging
and other mainstream activities, thought to be destroying authentic
Internet-culture. Sierra has commented on how things have progressed:
‘What happened to me pales in comparison to what’s happening to women
online today… I thought things would get better. Mostly, it’s just
gotten worse.’

Although online spaces and comment sections had started to develop a
shocking level of woman-hatred years before, one of the early mainstream
discussions of online misogynist extremism was sparked when Helen Lewis
interviewed feminist writers in the _New Statesman_, who brought to
light some of what they experienced. Feminist blogger and activist Cath
Elliot wrote:

If I’d been trying to keep a tally I would have lost count by now of the
number of abusive comments I’ve received since I first started writing
online back in 2007. And by abusive I don’t mean comments that disagree
with whatever I’ve written – I came up through the trade union movement
don’t forget, and I’ve worked in a men’s prison, so I’m not some
delicate flower who can’t handle a bit of banter or heated debate – no,
I’m talking about personal, usually sexualised abuse, the sort that on
more than one occasion now has made me stop and wonder if what I’m doing
is actually worth it. […] I read about how I’m apparently too ugly for
any man to want to rape, or I read graphic descriptions detailing
precisely how certain implements should be shoved into one or more of my
various orifices.

Feminist blogger Dawn Foster wrote:

The worst instance of online abuse I’ve encountered happened when I
blogged about the Julian Assange extradition case. […] Initially it was
shocking: in the space of a week, I received a rabid email that included
my home address, phone number and workplace address, included as a kind
of threat. Then, after tweeting that I’d been waiting for a night bus
for ages, someone replied that they hoped I’d get raped at the bus stop.

Feminist sex writer Petra Davis later wrote:

When I started getting letters at my flat, I reported them to the
police, but they advised me to stop writing provocative material.
Eventually, I was sent an email directing me to a website advertising my
services as a sex worker, with my address on the front page under the
legend ‘fuck her till she screams, filth whore, rape me all night cut me
open’, and some images of sexually mutilated women. It was very strange,
sitting quietly in front of my screen looking at those images, knowing
that the violence done to these other women was intended as a lesson… Of
course, it didn’t take long to take the site down, but by then I was
thoroughly sick of the idea and more or less stopped writing about sex
from any perspective.

Significant here is yet another cross-pollinating section of the broader
alt-right milieu – masculinist and neomasculinist anti-feminist online
subcultures. These are typically concerned with the decline of Western
masculinity and some advocate things like the male separatism of Men
Going Their Own Way (MGTOW), while others advise a more aggressive style
of social-Darwinian informed pick-up artistry to ‘game’ the human
system. But it was really the broadest orbit of the alt-right, which
became known as the alt-light, that popularized this new diffuse and
chaotic online set of cross-pollinating subcultures and helped bring it
into the mainstream. These included social media celebrity figures like
Milo, Twitter and blogging stars like Mike Cernovich, who wrote the male
assertiveness guide _Gorilla Mindset_, former _Vice_ editor Gavin
McInnes, and a host of Pepe meme-making gamers and 4chan-style
shitposters, who had little in the way of a coherent commitment to
conservative thought or politics but shared an anti-PC impulse and a
common aesthetic sensibility. What we now call the alt-right is really
this collection of lots of separate tendencies that grew
semi-independently but which were joined under the banner of a bursting
forth of anti-PC cultural politics through the culture wars of recent
years. The irreverent trolling style associated with 4chan grew in
popularity in response to the expanding identity politics of more
feminine spaces like Tumblr. This, itself, spilled over eventually into
‘real life’ in the ramping up of campus politics around safe spaces and
trigger warnings, ‘gamergate’ and many other battles.

One can feel the life draining out of the body at the thought of
retelling or rereading the story of the gamergate controversy, one which
involved internal controversies, hit pieces, hate campaigns, splits and
a level of sustained high emotion more fitting for a response to a
genocide than a spat over videogames. But for the sake of introduction
here is a synopsis, which will undoubtedly satisfy neither side. In the
lead-up to the gamergate controversy, feminist games critic Anita
Sarkeesian found herself at the receiving end of a hate campaign like
the Sierra case, but this time involving hundreds of thousands of
participants and a level of vitriol utterly baffling to those outside of
the gaming world, which lasted for several years. Her offence was
creating a series of YouTube videos introducing viewers to some
elementary concepts from feminist media criticism in an accessible and
pretty mild-mannered style. Her level of criticism, as a self-identified
games fan and someone who sought to reform rather than censor games,
would be considered quite normal in literary or film criticism. These
other audiences and critics are used to debate and to a relatively
civilized adult kind of discourse, in which one can describe an old
Hollywood classic as sexist without doubting its aesthetic value and one
can disagree without going straight to the rape and death threats. Her
videos feature no calls for video games to be censored or banned. They
also offer no criticisms more harsh than what you might read from other
pop-culture critics like Charlie Brooker or Mark Kermode on some very
obviously retrograde depictions of women in _some_ video games.

For this intolerable crime, Sarkeesian has endured years of
jaw-droppingly dark and disturbing personal abuse. Typical online
commentary has included things like: ‘I’ll rape you and put your head on
a stick’, ‘It would be funny if five guys raped her right now’, ‘I
violently masturbate to your face’ and the old 4chan standard ‘Tits or
get the fuck out’. Her Wikipedia page was vandalized with pornographic
images and hateful messages. There was also a campaign to mass report
all of her social media accounts as spam, fraud or even terrorism.

Attempts were made to hack her website through a distributed denial of
service (DDoS) attack and to hack into her email. Pornographic images of
her being raped by video game characters were created and one offended
male gamer even created a video game in which players could punch
Anita’s face until it was bloodied and bruised, and her eyes blackened
and swollen. If you look up Anita today on YouTube you’ll find countless
videos devoted to hating her and obsessively trying to destroy her
reputation and career. This was largely based on the fact that she ran a
Kickstarter campaign that made more money than initially planned
precisely because of the harassment. All of this was done, remember, to
prove that sexism was _definitely not_, as she had so outrageously
claimed, an issue in the ‘gaming community’.

Tactics such as DDoS and doxxing (exposing the person’s personal details
to enable their mass harassment) used by 4chan and originating in Usenet
culture became central to attacks by the anti-feminist gamers. Games
marketed to the anti-feminist gamergate audience were more likely to
aestheticize war, violence and technology, while in the years preceding
gamergate, the market for games directed at women had grown. This was
especially so with games like _Candy Crush_, aimed at teenage girls who
don’t know what _World of Warcraft_ is and which obviously offended
those who considered themselves real gamers. Gamergate itself kicked off
when Zoe Quinn created a video game called _Depression Quest_, which
even to a non-gamer like me looked like a terrible game featuring many
of the fragility and mental illness-fetishizing characteristics of the
kind of feminism that has emerged online in recent years. It was the
kind of game, about depression, that would have worked as a perfect
parody of everything the gamergaters hated about SJWs (social justice
warriors).

Nevertheless, her dreadful game got positive reviews from politically
sympathetic indie games journalists, which turned into a kind of
catalyst for the whole gamergate saga. It was understood to be either a
war over ethics in games journalism or an excuse to attack feminists and
women entering the gamer world, depending on whom you ask. First, let me
be clear on my own position on gaming. If you’re an adult, I think you
should probably be investing your emotional energies elsewhere. And that
includes feminist gaming, which has always struck me as being about as
appealing as feminist porn; in other words, not at all. However, anyone
with some grasp on the basic norms of human conduct will still be able
to see why the fallout was utterly unhinged based on Quinn’s bad game,
other cases of alleged biased reviews and what was no doubt an
ideological project to change gaming to make some of it more
feminist-friendly. It became possibly the biggest flame war in the
history of the Internet so far, an overreaction on a grand scale, in
which everyone accused everyone else of lying and malicious intent.

Eron Gjoni, Quinn’s ex-boyfriend, posted on forums that she had cheated
on him, setting off a wave of attacks on her in which she claims her
haters began sending revenge porn to her family and employers, and
trying to hack her accounts. Quinn was, needless to say, threatened with
rape and death, and was doxxed. They then attacked a series of feminist
gamers and games critics, who waded in, including Brianna Wu, Felicia
Day and Jennifer Allaway. In each case there are countless conflicting
accounts about the nature of threats and attacks, but even taking the
uncontroversial ones alone, it is fair to say they did receive a level
of abuse that in the pre-Internet days were reserved for few other than
child murderers. This got so out of hand that even the founder of 4chan
and champion of the anonymous Internet, moot, banned gamergate talk from
4chan, eventually causing him to leave the site, and the gamergaters
moved to the more lawless 8chan.

Quinn found and recorded some of the conversations that took place on a
4chan IRC called ‘burgersandfries’, in which users conspired to destroy
her career using the most extreme misogynist language and motivations.
In this chat, they express their hatred and disgust towards her, and
their glee at the thought of ruining her career. They also expressed
fantasies about her being raped and killed. They hoped all the
harassment would drive her to suicide and only the thought of 4chan
getting bad publicity in response convinced some of them that this isn’t
something they should hope for. They distributed falsified nude pictures
of her, posting links to online archives of them and sending them to
Quinn’s supporters. They attempted to dig up information about her
family and to track down anyone with links to her. One found a picture
of Quinn at age 13 and posted a link to it. So committed were they to
ethics in games journalism that in this discussion they discuss Quinn’s
vagina as ‘wide’, large enough to ‘fit 12 dicks at once’ and ‘a
festering cheese-filled vagina’ that leaves ‘a trail of cunt slime’
wherever she goes and then speculated about its smell.

Jenn Frank, an award-winning freelance games journalist, wrote an
article entitled ‘How to attack a woman who works in video gaming’ for
_The Guardian_ that looked at on-going harassment. It outlined the ways
in which trolls were harming women who work in the male-dominated field:

… someone recently and bafflingly tried to hack into my email and phone
contacts. This is all very frightening to write, and so I must disclose
that I _am_ biased, insofar as I am terrified. I have worked in this
industry for most of the last nine – not always perfect – years and I
have never professed to be a perfect person. However, my values, my
belief that abuse must not, cannot become ‘normal’, ‘acceptable’ or
‘expected’ is at odds with _oh, God, please, why are they doing this,
what’s the point, don’t let it be me, don’t let it be me_. My unabashed
love for video games, my colleagues and my work have a conflict of
interest with my own terror.

Games writer Jennifer Hepler also came under attacks, in which she
claims to have been sent hundreds of abusive messages on Twitter,
calling her things like an ‘obese cunt’ and threatening her. Feminist
gamers complained that games writer Felicia Day was publicly dismissed
as a ‘booth babe’ by a male games journalist. Games designer Patricia
Hernandez drew the attention of 4chan, when she called it a ‘cathedral
of misogyny’. Encyclopedia Dramatica has a permanent entry for the memes
4chan created inspired by her comment, where she is described as:

A fat, wetback ‘game journalist’ with sausage fingers and a chin like
Jay Leno who works for Kotaku, a gaming gossip site infamous for
allowing game designers to sleep with its columnists for good reviews
and publicity. Patricia is a noted lesbian and feminazi who follows in
Kotaku’s proud tradition of writing countless articles about how various
games either promote rape or literally rape their female players.
Another staple of Kotaku ‘journalism’ she takes part in is nepotism,
which explains why every other article to come from her chubby hands is
about her live-in girlfriend.

Without getting too far into the minutiae, and at this point it would be
impossible to reach the end of all the various accusations of lies and
contestations of how the mass event unfolded, the important feature of
the furor here is the role it played in uniting different online groups
and in spreading the tactics of chan culture to the broad online right.
Gamergate brought gamers, rightist chan culture, anti-feminism and the
online far right closer to mainstream discussion and it also politicized
a broad group of young people, mostly boys, who organized tactics around
the idea of fighting back against the culture war being waged by the
cultural left. These included all kinds of people from critics of
political correctness to those interested in the overreach of feminist
cultural crusades. These brought in to the fold people like Christina
Hoff Sommers, the classical liberal who started a video series called
_The Factual Feminist_, which aimed to expose faulty statistics within
feminism. Somewhere in the mix with the polite and light-hearted Sommers
were also apolitical gamers, _South Park_ conservatives, 4channers,
hardline anti-feminists, and young people in the process of moving to
the political far right without any of the moral baggage of
conservatism. It also made Milo’s ill-fated career, as he used it to
shoot to mainstream celebrity status. Ultimately, the gamergaters were
correct in their perception that a revived feminist movement was trying
to change the culture and this was the front, their beloved games, that
they chose to fight back on. The battle has since moved on to different
issues with increasingly higher stakes, but this was the galvanizing
issue that drew up the battle lines of the culture wars for a younger
online generation.

The culture of 4chan, Anonymous etc., in the pre-gamergate days of
Occupy and Anonymous could have gone another way. Long before this
‘geeks vs feminists’ battle, the libertarian left had its own
pro-hacker, pro-computer geek, Internet-centric political tradition,
which some in the early Anonymous milieu obviously drew influence from.
Hakim Bey’s idea of the temporary autonomous zone was based on what he
called ‘pirate utopias’ and he argued that the attempt to form a
permanent culture or politics inevitably deteriorates into a structured
system that stifles individual creativity. His language and ideas
influenced anarchism and later, online cultures that advocated illegal
downloading, anonymity, hacking and experiments like bitcoin. Echoes of
John Perry Barlow’s manifesto ‘A Declaration of the Independence of
Cyberspace’ can be seen in this earlier period of Anon culture and in
analyses that reflect a more radical horizontalist politics, like
Gabriella Coleman’s work. Barlow was one of the founders of the
Electronic Frontier Foundation, anarchist hackers and defenders of an
Internet free of state intervention, capitalist control and monopolizing
of the online world. In a similar style to the rhetoric of 4chan and
Anonymous (‘we are legion’), it warned:

Governments of the Industrial World, you weary giants of flesh and
steel, I come from Cyberspace, the home of Mind. On behalf of the future
I ask you of the past to leave us alone. You are not welcome among us.
You have no sovereignty where we gather.

Instead, this leaderless anonymous online culture ended up becoming
characterized by a particularly dark preoccupation with thwarted or
failed white Western masculinity as a grand metaphor, which has had some
‘real-life’ manifestations. On 4chan a post, dated October 1, 2015,
read:

The first of our kind has struck fear into the hearts of America… This
is only the beginning. The Beta Rebellion has begun. Soon, more of our
brothers will take up arms to become martyrs to this revolution.

The dramatic and knowingly cinematic tone was typical of the online
style that hides itself from interpretation through a postmodern tonal
distance, so that if any normie were to interpret it literally they
would be laughed at. But in this case it was referring to the real news
that a young man named Chris Harper-Mercer had killed nine classmates
and injured nine others before shooting himself at Umpqua Community
College in Roseburg, Oregon. The night before the shooting, a post on
4chan’s /r9k/ board warned fellow commenters from the Northwestern
United States to steer clear of school that day. The first responder in
the thread asked: ‘Is the beta uprising finally going down?’ while
others encouraged the anonymous poster and gave him tips on how to
conduct a mass shooting.

In 2014, an anonymous 4chan user submitted several photos of what
appeared to be a woman’s naked and strangled corpse, along with a
confession:

Turns out it’s way harder to strangle someone to death than it looks on
the movies… Her son will be home from school soon. He’ll find her then
call the cops. I just wanted to share the pics before they find me. I
bought a bb gun that looks realistic enough. When they come, I’ll pull
it and it will be suicide by cop. I understand the doubts. Just check
the fucking news. I have to lose my phone now.

Police later announced that the victim, Amber Lynn Coplin, was the woman
in the photo. Her boyfriend, David Michael Kalac, was arrested after a
brief police chase and charged with murder.

If further proof that the anti-PC taboo-breaking culture of 4chan is not
just ‘for the lulz’ is needed, after the November 2015 shooting of five
Black Lives Matter protesters in Minneapolis, a video emerged of two of
the men involved, wearing balaclavas and driving to a Black Lives Matter
protest, saying: ‘We just wanted to give everyone a heads up on /pol/…
Stay white.’

Just a few years ago the left-cyberutopians claimed that ‘the disgust
had become a network’ and that establishment old media could no longer
control politics, that the new public sphere was going to be based on
leaderless user-generated social media. This network has indeed arrived,
but it has helped to take the right, not the left, to power. Those on
the left who fetishized the spontaneous leaderless Internet-centric
network, declaring all other forms of doing politics old hat, failed to
realize that the leaderless form actually told us little about the
philosophical, moral or conceptual content of the movements involved.
Into the vacuum of ‘leaderlessness’ almost anything could appear. No
matter how networked, ‘transgressive’, social media savvy or
non-hierarchical a movement may be, it is the content of its ideas that
matter just as much as at any point in history, as Evgeny Morozov
cautioned at the time. The online environment has undoubtedly allowed
fringe ideas and movements to grow rapidly in influence and while these
were left leaning it was tempting for politically sympathetic
commentators to see it as a shiny new seductive shortcut to transcending
our ‘end of history’. What we’ve since witnessed instead is that this
leaderless formation can express just about any ideology even, strange
as it may seem, that of the far right.



CHAPTER TWO



THE ONLINE POLITICS OF TRANSGRESSION


Transgression has been embraced as a virtue within Western social
liberalism ever since the 60s, typically applied today as it is in bell
hooks’ _Teaching to Transgress_. So elevated has the virtue of
transgression become in the criticism of art, argued Kieran Cashell,
that contemporary art critics have been faced with a challenge: ‘either
support transgression unconditionally or condemn the tendency and risk
obsolescence amid suspicions of critical conservatism’ as the great art
critic Robert Hughes often was. But, Cashell wrote, on the value placed
upon transgression in contemporary art: ‘In the pursuit of the
irrational, art has become negative, nasty and nihilistic.’ Literary
critic Anthony Julius has also noted the resulting ‘unreflective
contemporary endorsement of the transgressive’.

Those who claim that the new right-wing sensibility online today is just
more of the same old right, undeserving of attention or differentiation,
are wrong. Although it is constantly changing, in this important early
stage of its appeal, its ability to assume the aesthetics of
counterculture, transgression and nonconformity tells us many things
about the nature of its appeal and about the liberal establishment it
defines itself against. It has more in common with the 1968 left’s
slogan ‘It is forbidden to forbid!’ than it does with anything most
recognize as part of any traditionalist right. Instead of interpreting
it as part of other right-wing movements, conservative or libertarian, I
would argue that the style being channelled by the Pepe meme-posting
trolls and online transgressives follows a tradition that can be traced
from the eighteenth-century writings of the Marquis de Sade, surviving
through to the nineteenth-century Parisian avant-garde, the Surrealists,
the rebel rejection of feminized conformity of post-war America and then
to what film critics called 1990s ‘male rampage films’ like _American
Psycho_ and _Fight Club_.

Milo’s favorite description of the unifying ‘troll-y’ sensibility across
the new wave of the online right is ‘transgressive’. Ever the
unconvincing conservative, he would often say things like, ‘the best sex
is dangerous, transgressive, dirty’ and that conservatism is the ‘new
punk’ because it’s ‘transgressive, subversive, fun’. He regularly makes
the comparison between punk and the alt-right, and obviously he’s using
the term in the broadest possible way. The ease with which this broader
alt-right and alt-light milieu can use transgressive styles today shows
how superficial and historically accidental it was that it ended up
being in any way associated with the socialist left.

The use of the swastikas or Nazi flirtations as part of a performance
certainly has precedents. Joy Division, whose singer Ian Curtis was on
the political right, named themselves after the Freudenabteilung, the
name of the German camp brothels in WWII. In 1976, in the company of the
Sex Pistols, Siouxse Sioux was beaten up for wearing her swastika
armband. Her intention was certainly to shock and offend, but few would
argue that it was an earnest declaration of allegiance to Nazism. In
post-WWII Britain, one can imagine the weight of the reverence toward
the heroes who died fighting Nazism, and the suffering of many British
citizens who lived through bombing raids and harsh years of economic
austerity. At worst, the armband in this context can be seen as a
brattish display of disrespect for its own sake. At best, it can be
understood as a typically avant-garde style of transgressing taboos and
as a two fingers to the post WWII establishment, who would use the
heroism of the dead to stifle and repress dissent against queen and
country.

In an interview with Esquire, weev/Auernheimer, with the swastika tattoo
on his chest, explained his sensibility to the journalist:

I’m at a restaurant with Auernheimer and his friend Jaime Cochrane, who
is a softly spoken transgender troll from the group Rustle League,
so-called because ‘that’s what trolling is, it’s rustling people’s
jimmies’. They’re explaining to me their version of what trolls do.
‘It’s not bullying,’ says Cochrane. ‘It’s satirical performance art.’
Cyberbullies who drive teenagers to suicide have crossed the line.
However, trolling is the more high-minded business of what Cochrane
calls ‘aggressive rhetoric’, a tradition that goes back to Socrates,
Jesus and the trickster god Loki, from Norse mythology. Auernheimer
likens himself to Shakespeare’s Puck. Cochrane aspires to Lenny Bruce
and Andy Kaufman. They talk of culture jamming, the art of disrupting
the status quo to make people think. They talk of Abbie Hoffman.

Significantly, the character of Patrick Bateman from the film adaptation
of the novel _American Psycho_ by Bret Easton Ellis has been one of the
most common film references found on forums like 4chan and later the
alt-right, alt-light and anti-feminist forums, along with _Fight Club_
and _The Matrix_. The film tells the story of a narcissistic and
sociopathic serial killer who watches pornography obsessively, is
sexually violent to prostitutes, kills the homeless with relish and
inflicts sexual torture on women in the novel so extreme it rivals de
Sade in moral boundary pushing. Literary critic Daniel Fuchs has argued
that the novel was part of a literary style, following on from Henry
Miller and Norman Mailer, which used notions of transgression and sexual
sovereignty from de Sade, and applied them as a form of rebellion and
liberation through sexual aggression and violence. It is worth noting
that one of the defenses made of _American Psycho_ against its critics,
during the debates sparked by its shocking sexual violence, was that the
author had left some ambiguity at the end of the novel, suggesting that
the events may have only been the crazed fantasies of the main
character. Just like the style of the rightist chan culture,
interpretation and judgment are evaded through tricks and layers of
metatextual self-awareness and irony.

The cult of the moral transgressor as a heroic individual is rooted in
Romanticism. But, as Simon Reynolds and Joy Press explore in their study
of post-war rebel masculinity _Sex Revolts_, it was revived in
twentieth-century countercultures. Norman Mailer posited the psychopath
as a noble and transgressive figure in fiction. He saw the hipster
(which had somewhat different connotations at the time to the beard
oil-applying variety of today) as borrowing from the tradition of the
noble psychopath of fiction in his disregard for social conventions and
the mainstream, and perceived the fictional psychopath as a symbol of
being freed from sexual, social and moral inhibitions. The psychopath,
like the artist, privileges id over superego and desire over moral
constraints. Dostoyevsky’s anti-hero in _Crime and Punishment_,
Raskolnikov, asserted his own right to transcend the morality of the
lesser masses when he killed a ‘worthless’ old woman. Echoed in the
style of contemporary transgressive anti-moral cultures like 4chan that
later fused with the alt-right, was French writer Maurice Blanchot’s
dictum that ‘the greatest suffering of others always counts for less
than my pleasure’.

Also in Press and Reynolds’s analysis, from _One Flew Over the Cuckoo’s
Nest_ to Michel Foucault’s _Madness and Civilization_ and R. D. Laing’s
_The Politics of Experience_, madness was consistently recast as
nonconformity in this transgressive style. For de Sade, the Surrealists,
and later for the 60s anti-repression cultural politics most closely
associated with R. D. Laing, insanity was considered a creative source,
a rejection of mainstream norms and a political act of rebellion. The
surreal became a pre-rational creative expression. The throwing off of
the id that characterized this transgressive countercultural traditional
also characterized sites like 4chan, and its culture of trolling and
taboo-breaking anti-moral humor, which is often described as insane or
unhinged to baffled outsiders.

This view of psychopathy and rejection of imposed morality runs through
the ethos and aesthetic of the rightist trolling culture. In one early
self-description, a 4chan/b/ enthusiast wrote:

/b/ is the guy who tells the cripple ahead of him in line to hurry up.
/b/ is first to get to the window to see the car accident outside. /b/
is the one who wrote your number on the mall’s bathroom wall. /b/ is a
failing student who makes passes at his young, attractive English
teacher. /b/ is the guy loitering on Park Ave. that is always trying to
sell you something. /b/ is the one who handed his jizz-drenched clothes
to Good Will. (…) /b/ is a hot incest dream that you’ll try to forget
for days. /b/ is the only one of your group of friends to be secure in
his sexuality and say anything. /b/ is the guy without ED who still
likes trying Viagra. /b/ is the best friend that tags along for your
first date and cock-blocks throughout the night. The decent girl you’re
trying to bag walks out on the date, /b/ laughs and takes you home when
you’re drunk, and you wake up to several hookers in your house who /b/
called for you. /b/ is a friend that constantly asks you to try mutual
masturbation with him. /b/ is the guy who calls a suicide hotline to hit
on the advisor. /b/ is nuking the hard-drive next time someone knocks on
his door. /b/ is the one who left a used condom outside the schoolyard.
/b/ is the voice in your head that tells you that it doesn’t matter if
she’s drunk. /b/ is the friend who constantly talks about your mom’s
rack. /b/ is the only one who understands what the hell you saying. /b/
is someone who would pay a hooker to eat his ass, and only that. /b/ is
the uncle who has touched you several times. /b/ is still recovering in
the hospital, after trying something he saw in a hentai. /b/ is the
pleasure you feel guilty of when you tried playing with your anus during
masturbation. /b/ is wonderful.

The expression ‘an hero’ became part of chan slang. As Whitney Phillips
recounts in her book _This Is Why We Can’t Have Nice Things_, when a
schoolboy from Minnesota called Mitchell Henderson shot himself, a
message was left from a classmate on a MySpace memorial page read that
Mitchell was ‘an hero to take the shot, to leave us all behind. God do
we wish we could take it back.’ 4chan found this hilarious because of
the mixture of the earnest emotional vulnerability and the grammatical
error. There was also a reference on his memorial page to his lost iPod,
which turned into a joke that became so elaborate that Henderson’s
MySpace page was hacked, while another placed an iPod on Henderson’s
grave, took a picture and posted it to 4chan. His face was pasted onto
spinning iPods and hard-core porn scenes, and a re-enactment of
Henderson’s death soon appeared on YouTube, involving a shattered iPod.
Mitchell’s father received prank calls to his house, in which callers
said things like: ‘Hi, I’ve got Mitchell’s iPod’ and, ‘Hi, I’m
Mitchell’s ghost, the front door is locked. Can you come down and let me
in?’

Phillips also documented how when a US teenager called Chelsea King was
raped and murdered, the Facebook pages devoted to finding her turned
into memorial pages to mourn her and then trolling of these pages began,
sometimes orchestrated on 4chan. Prank pages such as ‘I bet this Pickle
can get more fans than Chelsea King’ were set up. Thus began a whole
genre of trolling, generally referred to at the time as ‘RIP trolling’
emanating from 4chan’s culture.

The forum’s preoccupation with suicide, which became used as a verb to
‘an hero’, often takes the form of painful expressions of anonymous
users’ desire to commit suicide themselves, and at the same time it
mocks suicide victims and those who express sympathy with the victims.
Forum users come to the most arguably unsympathetic place imaginable to
tell others of their suicidal fantasies anonymously, where they will
probably be half-jokingly told to do it. They thus reject the perceived
sentimentality of the mainstream media’s suicide spectacles and instead
remake it as their own dark spectacle, in which pity is replaced by
cruelty. And yet, because both the act of suicide and the displays of
insensitivity toward suicide victims are perceived as forms of
transgression, both found a home within this strangely internally
coherent online world. What other kind of ideas and styles are being
drawn upon by this new transgressive rightist sensibility?

Nietzsche, one of the main thinkers being channeled by rightist chan
culture knowingly or otherwise, argued for transgression of the
pacifying moral order and instead for a celebration of life as the will
to power. As a result, his ideas had appeal to everyone from the Nazis
to feminists like Lily Braun. Today, the appeal of his anti-moralism is
strong on the alt-right because their goals necessitate the repudiation
of Christian codes that Nietzsche characterized as slave morality.
Freud, on the other hand, characterized transgression as an
anti-civilizational impulse, as part of the antagonism between the
freedom of instinctual will and the necessary repressions of
civilization. Perhaps the most significant theorist of transgression
Georges Bataille inherited his idea of sovereignty from de Sade,
stressing self-determination over obedience. Although rightist chan
culture was undoubtedly not what Bataille had in mind, the politically
fungible ideas and styles of these aesthetic transgressives are echoed
in the porn-fuelled shocking content of early /b/ and in the later
anti-liberal transgressions of the later /pol/. Bataille revered
transgression in and of itself, and like de Sade viewed non-procreative
sex as an expression of the sovereign against instrumentalism, what he
called ‘expenditure without reserve’. For him excessive behavior without
purpose, which also characterizes the sensibility of contemporary meme
culture in which enormous human effort is exerted with no obvious
personal benefit, was paradigmatically transgressive in an age of
Protestant instrumental rationality.

The culture that produced both Operation Birthday Boy and elaborate RIP
page trolling became what you might call the unwanted gift, a twist on
Mauss’s _The Gift_ that early Internet theorists used as a central
metaphor for the non-instrumental culture of sharing that it nurtured.
In _The Revolution of Everyday Life_ by the Situationist thinker Raoul
Vaneigem, Mauss’s principle of the gift, originally used to describe
reciprocal gift-giving systems in pre-modern societies, was celebrated
on the grounds that only the purity of motiveless destruction or ruinous
generosity can transcend instrumentalism. The Situationists’ critique of
‘the poverty of every day life’, like Baudelaire’s _An oasis of horror
in a desert of boredom_, articulated a common sentiment found from the
Romantics through to contemporary online cultures of transgression, that
ennui, boredom and inertia requires a counterforce of extreme
transgression. And yet these ideas often transcended the abstract. But
while the Situationists had a better world in their hearts, the
nihilistic application of the transgressive style already took shape in
the 60s counterculture. ‘The Manson murders’, Reynolds and Press argued,
‘were the logical culmination of throwing off the shackles of conscience
and consciousness, the grim flowering of the id’s voodoo energies.’

Another conceptualization of transgression that applies to this culture
has been the idea of the carnivalesque. In _The Politics and Poetics of
Transgression_, Stallybrass and White considered the carnivalesque to be
a form of radical transgression against hierarchy and hegemony: ‘The
grotesque tends to operate as a critique of a dominant ideology which
has already set the terms designating what is high and what is low.’
This is very much how 4chan has long self-described and how it was
described by its early ‘progressive’ boosters, except that the dominant
ideology in the time of 4chan has been cultural liberalism, and the
‘low’ therefore meant un-PC poor taste, rudeness, shock, offence and
trolling. The carnivalesque was also theorized by Bakhtin, whose
ideologically flexible and ambivalent definition sounds much like some
of the self-descriptions of trolls on what trolling is doing:

Carnival laughter is the laughter of all the people. Second, it is
universal in scope; it is directed at all and everyone, including the
carnival’s participants. The entire world is seen in its droll aspect,
in its gay relativity. Third, this laughter is ambivalent; it is gay,
triumphant, and at the same time mocking, deriding.

The transgressive style is not without precedent on the formally
political conservative right, either. The Federation of Conservative
Students in the UK famously shocked with a poster saying ‘Hang Nelson
Mandela’ and criticized Thatcher for her soft touch, perhaps an early
version of the ‘cuckervative’ jibe. They also had libertarian and
authoritarian wings of thought, but certainly constituted a break from
the decorum of the Burkeans, adopting some of the harder edge of the
Thatcher era, even flirting with far-right ideas.

The reformist-left writer Christopher Lasch applied the Freudian
conception of transgression as anti-civilizational to his critique of
the vacuous nihilism and narcissism of post 60s American consumer
society. But since the 60s the norm has until now been that critics of
transgression have generally come from the right. Theorist of
post-industrial society Daniel Bell lamented the transgressive ethos of
the 60s and warned of its ‘obsessive preoccupation with homosexuality,
transvestism, buggery, and, most pervasive of all, publicly displayed
oral-genital intercourse.’ The transgressive irreverent style of the 60s
counterculture was everything the right hated in previous culture wars.
The ‘adversary culture’ bemoaned by conservative anti-feminists like
Phyllis Schlafly and the neocons of _Commentary_ magazine warned against
the destructive impulses of the transgressive sensibility.

Feminism’s relationship to the cultural politics of transgression is
more complicated still. When the second wave of feminism burst forth in
the 60s, captured in Betty Friedan’s _The Feminine Mystique_, it was
regarded by the right as part of the broader sexual revolution and the
transgressive culture that was going to destroy the US family, moral
restraints and tradition. In the battle over Roe vs Wade and Phyllis
Schlafly’s war on the Equal Rights Amendment, feminism was very much on
the side of the transgressive tradition of de Sade, as it sought to
destroy moralism and free the id. However, for some feminists the id of
their transgressive male peers proved a little too free. Criticisms of
the inequities of ‘free love’, and the hypocrisies and inequalities
experienced by women in anti-war and other activist movements in the 60s
and 70s, started to emerge from feminist writing as a kind of critique
of the counterculture. The pornified culture produced by the sexual
revolution soon came under its harshest criticisms from feminists like
Andrea Dworkin and Catharine MacKinnon by the 80s, and soon the
war-on-porn feminists even aligned with conservatives, who had
previously denounced feminism as central to the debauchery of the 60s.

During the recent online culture wars, and their spillover into campus
and protest politics, feminists have tried to embrace transgression with
the Slut Walk movement and sex-positive pro-trans, pro-sex worker and
pro-kink culture that was central to Tumblr. However, like the right, it
has run up against a deep philosophical problem about the ideologically
flexible, politically fungible, morally neutral nature of transgression
as a style, which can characterize misogyny just as easily as it can
sexual liberation. As Lasch understood, for progressive politics
anti-moral transgression has always been a bargain with the devil,
because the case for equality is essentially a moral one.

Equally hated and loved critic Camille Paglia argued that de Sade’s
depiction of human evil as innate was a form of satire directed against
the Rousseauist tradition, from which contemporary feminism springs. De
Sade’s work famously features sexual violence as well as abhorrence for
family and procreation, instead creating a violent transgressive
sexuality based on the values of libertinism and individual sovereignty.
In _Juliette_ one rule of _The Sodality of the Friends of Crime_ was,
‘True libertinage abhors progeniture’. Paglia argued that de Sade’s
devaluing of the procreative female body, and his preoccupation with
heterosexual and homosexual sodomy, also shared by chan culture, were
not merely the product of a homosexual impulse, as argued by feminist
Simone de Beauvoir, but a ‘protest against relentlessly overabundant
procreative nature’. Author Susan Suleiman wrote that:

The founding desire behind Sadeian fantasy is the active negation of the
mother. The Sadeian hero’s anti-naturalism goes hand in hand with his
hatred of mothers, identified as the “natural” source of life.

That the transgressive values of de Sade could be taken up by a culture
of misogyny and characterized an online anti-feminist movement that
rejected traditional church-going conservatism should also not be a
surprise. The Blakean motto adopted by the Surrealists, ‘Sooner murder
an infant in its cradle than nurse unacted desires’, dominance as sexual
‘sovereignty’ and the freeing of the id from the constraints of the
conscience have all descended from this transgressive tradition. Just as
Nietzsche appealed to the Nazis as a way to formulate a right-wing
anti-moralism, it is precisely the transgressive sensibility that is
used to excuse and rationalize the utter dehumanization of women and
ethnic minorities in the alt-right online sphere now. The culture of
transgression they have produced liberates their conscience from having
to take seriously the potential human cost of breaking the taboo against
racial politics that has held since WWII. The Sadean transgressive
element of the 60s, condemned by conservatives for decades as the very
heart of the destruction of civilization, the degenerate and the
nihilistic, is not being challenged by the emergence of this new online
right. Instead, the emergence of this new online right is the full
coming to fruition of the transgressive anti-moral style, its final
detachment from any egalitarian philosophy of the left or Christian
morality of the right.



CHAPTER THREE



GRAMSCIANS OF THE ALT-LIGHT


There were two major figures of the online culture wars Trumpian right
who wrote glowingly about the hard core of the alt-right in a heavily
quoted piece in _Breitbart_ called ‘An Establishment Conservative’s
Guide To The Alt-Right’. These were Milo Yiannopoulos and Allum Bokhari,
who traced the intellectual roots of the amorphous alt-right back, in
quite a flattering portrayal of the movement, to a number of key
intellectuals and schools of thought. They singled out Oswald Spengler,
the German philosopher who wrote _The Decline of the West_ in 1918, who
influenced the whole discourse of civilizational decline and advocated a
nationalist non-Marxist socialism and authoritarianism, H. L. Mencken,
the deeply elitist but undeniably brilliant anti-New Deal US satirist
and cultural critic, who also made Nietzschean criticisms of religion
and representative democracy, Julius Evola, the Italian philosopher
loved by the Italian fascist movement, who advanced traditionalist and
masculinist values and believed modern man lived in a Dark Age, Samuel
Francis, the paleoconservative US columnist and critic of pro-capitalist
neoconservatism and lastly, the French New Right, who importantly were
sometimes called ‘Gramscians of the right’.

The French New Right or Nouvelle Droite adapted the theories of Antonio
Gramsci that political change follows cultural and social change. Andrew
Breitbart’s phrase was that politics is always ‘downstream from
culture’, and was often quoted by Milo. Belgian far-right
anti-immigration party Vlaams Blok leader Filip Dewinter put it like
this: ‘the ideological majority is more important than the parliamentary
majority.’

Prior to 1968, the right had taken the view that ‘ordinary people’ were
still inherently conservative, which you can see echoed today in the
‘silent majority’ rhetoric of modern establishment conservatives. The
French New Right’s Gramscian aim, which the alt-right today also shares,
was to break with the view that defeat of radical elites or vanguards
would enable the restoration of a popular traditional order and instead
took stock of how profoundly the 60s had changed the general population
and become hegemonic.

As Andrew Hartman outlined in his book on the 90s culture wars, _The War
for the Soul of America_, the radical upheavals of Paris 1968 and the
rise of the New Left was proof to the demoralized right that the whole
culture would now have to be retaken before formal political change
could come. This led to the pursuit of a ‘metapolitics’, and a rejection
of the political party and traditional activism within a section of the
right. Instead, they set about rethinking their philosophical
foundations and creating new ways to counter the ‘68 ideology of Social
Progress. The resulting French New Right shared many of the alt-right’s
preoccupations like multiculturalism and imminent Western decline, also
drawing on and adapting ideas from across the political spectrum. For
example, they had a strong critique of capitalism, promoting instead
local ‘organic democracy’.

Today, the movement that has been most remarkably successful at changing
the culture rather than the formal politics is the alt-light. They were
the youthful bridge between the alt-right and mainstream Trumpism.
Although the tactics of the online right are updated to a digital age,
it is hard to think of a better term than Gramscian to describe what
they have strategically achieved, as a movement almost entirely based on
influencing culture and shifting the Overton window through media and
culture, not just formal politics.

They succeeded largely by bypassing the dying mainstream media and
creating an Internet-culture and alternative media of their own from the
ground up. Here, I want to look more closely at those being called the
alt-light, who became major independent social media figures with huge
audiences well before Trump’s win. They influenced Internet-culture and
eventually more mainstream culture. How did they do this and why did it
work?

First, think for a moment about the amount of scholarly and polemical
writing that has come from a broadly left perspective in recent
generations, attempting to explain why it is that the project of the
revolutionary socialist left continues to fail and remains unpopular.
Entire schools of thought about the culture industry, media hegemony,
discourse, narrative, normativity and power have this problem either
overtly or implicitly at their core. Edward Herman and Noam Chomsky’s
‘manufacturing consent’ thesis has remained quite dominant in left
rhetoric ever since it was written. The Frankfurt School and the
Situationists remain canonical in university theory courses. Of all the
Marxian and Marxoid schools of thought, Gramsci’s is perhaps the most
influential today, placing media and culture at the center of political
analysis and praxis in a mediated age after the decline of the old
labour movement.

And yet at the end of 2016 it was the candidate of the right, Donald
Trump, who was elected President of the United States despite all
mainstream news agencies, including conservative media from Fox News to
National Review, working openly against him. Figures like Milo, who were
being dismissed as an irrelevant Internet fringe despite their growing
mass online audiences right up until the election results came in, rose
to mainstream success along with him.

Let’s also remember that during the Obama years millennial cultural
liberals had their own new media platforms to fill the vacuum left by
the decline in the centrality of mainstream newspapers and TV as the
general arena for public discourse. In this brave new world of clicks
and content, their alternative came in the form of the often-sentimental
feel-good clickbait sites like Upworthy and listicle sites like
Buzzfeed. Other liberal sites like Everyday Feminism, Jezebel and Salon
delivered a strange mixture of ultra-sensitivity, sentimentality and
what was once considered radical social constructionist identity
politics.

These sites ran headlines that became almost self-satirizing like ‘8
Signs Your Yoga Practice Is Culturally Appropriated’, ‘Men can be
feminists but it’s really hard work’, ‘19 Of The Most Totally Amazing
Body-Shaming Clap Backs’ and many others on toxic masculinity, fat
pride, gender-neutral toys and quandaries about moral and culturally
sensitive consumerism. Clickhole, a project of The Onion, emerged as a
timely satirical site that brilliantly mocked the liberal clickbait
style with inane titles like: ‘10 Things People With a Spider On Their
Face Are Tired of Hearing’ and ‘Our Country Has Become Worryingly
Desensitized To Violence In Hot-Sauce Names’.

Unintentionally amusing and easily satirized as sites like Upworthy may
have been, at its height in 2013 it was averaging about 75,000 Facebook
likes per article, while its site traffic was coming in at around 87
million unique visitors per month. In 2015, the liberal listicle site
Buzzfeed’s articles were getting more shares on social media than BBC
and Fox News put together. All of these were liberal,
millennial-oriented and openly propagandistic.

While the alt-right regard these and the Guardian, BBC and CNN as the
media of ‘the left’, espousing ‘Cultural Marxism’, it became obvious
when the possibility of any kind of economically ‘left’ political force
emerged that liberal media sources were often the most vicious and
oppositional. Liberal feminist journalist Joan Walsh called Bernie
Sanders’s supporters ‘Berniebot keyboard warriors’, while Salon was one
of the main propagators of the Berniebro meme with headlines like,
‘Bernie Bros out of control: Explosion of misogynist rage…’ and, ‘Just
like a Bernie Bro, Sanders bullies Clinton…’ Meanwhile _Vice_, a
magazine that made its brand on the most degenerate combination of
vacuous hipster aesthetics and pornified transgression, published things
like ‘How to spot a brocialist’. Before the elections _The Guardian_
newspaper ran a piece with the comically cultish wording: ‘Time to hail
Hillary Clinton – and face down the testosterone left’.

Despite overwhelming evidence of Bernie’s popularity among young women,
the myth was relentlessly peddled until it passed into the realm of
Internet truth. The old liberal establishment then weighed in; for
example, when feminist Gloria Steinem claimed that these numerous female
Bernie fans were merely trying to impress their male peers. In the UK,
an almost identical phenomenon occurred when the British liberal media
establishment, particularly _The Guardian_, joined forces with their
more youthful online offspring in smearing Corbyn and his supporters as
being motivated primarily by this nefarious tide of brocialism, despite
his squeaky-clean track record on women’s issues in the UK.

Where, then, was the real left’s alternative media during this period?
On YouTube, _The Young Turks_ emerged as one of the few genuinely
popular talk-show platform video producers, with 3 million subscribers
and typical video views of 100,000 to 200,000. British Laborite Owen
Jones started producing popular interview videos. Further to the left,
_Jacobin_ magazine was undoubtedly the success story of this period in
print publishing and certainly the most interesting media project
intellectually. This is because it gave a platform to left critics of
the liberal Hillary-supporting center left like Adolph Reed, Walter Benn
Michaels, Amber A’Lee Frost, Connor Kilpatrick, Liza Featherstone and
many others. Inevitably _Jacobin_, too, was smeared for being the
magazine of choice for Bros and ‘the white left’, despite its two key
founders being the children of Jamaican and Trinidadian immigrants, and
of having its logo based on the Black Jacobin.

In 2016, the podcast Chapo Trap House also emerged as a form of left
comedy, which specialized in mocking the most absurd outer limits of
online identity politics of the right and to a lesser degree, the
liberal left. In the UK, _Novara Media_ had a relatively small following
but produced short and sharp video content, which few on the left have
been doing, giving voice to British black and Asian left voices from a
London-based multicultural point of view. Current Affairs was also a
small but important left-wing print project that critiqued the liberal
left as well as the right.

But what few on the left were paying attention to in the years leading
up to Trump’s election, and really throughout the entire Obama
administration, was the alt-light building a multilayered alternative
online media empire that would dwarf many of the above. This stretched
from white nationalist bloggers in its sparsely populated corners to the
charismatic YouTubers and Twitter celebrities in its more popular form.
These included right-wing outsiders such as Steve Bannon who, through
building a publication like _Breitbart_, became chief strategist to the
US president.

YouTube vloggers produced an abundance of popular commentary videos and
‘SJW cringe compilations’, while alt-light celebrities like Milo built
careers from exposing the absurdities of the kind of Tumblr identity
politics that had gone mainstream through listicle sites like Buzzfeed
and anti-free speech safe space campus politics. Meanwhile, ironic
meme-making adolescent shitposters formed a reserve army of often darkly
funny chan-style image-based content producers, who could be easily
summoned in moments like gamergate or whenever big figures like Milo
needed backup, to swarm and harass their opposition.

Since 2015, the Canadian conservative project The Rebel Media produced
high production value video shows for YouTube. Some big names included
Gavin McInnes, former editor of _Vice_ magazine, and Lauren Southern,
who specialized in filming Vox Pops at SlutWalks and campus protests, in
which she challenged the protesters in a mocking style that reminded me
very much of the genre perfected by liberal media during the rise of the
Tea Party movement, in which the interviewees were always made to look
stupid. Led by Ezra Levant, formerly from the conservative _Sun News_
network, the move was designed to cut costs and go exclusively online
unencumbered by TV regulations. To launch the YouTube channel a
crowdfunding campaign raised around $100,000 (Canadian dollars) and then
launched a pay service of $8.00 per month for access to all the media
outlet’s YouTube shows. After the elections, The Rebel announced they
had recorded 19 million video views in a 30-day period. On an average
day, according to their official figures, more than 600,000 people watch
Rebel videos. These figures are even a low estimate when you take into
account the amount of reposted material sourced from Rebel appearing on
other YouTube channels.

Gavin McInnes’ subscriber show on Rebel called _How’s It Goin’, Eh?_
mixed politics and comedy. His free-to-view shows typically featured a
10-minute piece about current events in the culture wars. McInnes, who
was born in England to Scottish parents, has a kind of _South Park_
conservative political sensibility. He started his creative life in a
punk band called Anal Chinook and now calls himself a ‘free-market
capitalist’ and ‘anarchist’ with a somewhat unconvincing or at least
conflicted moral conservative streak. He advocates porn abstinence and
traditional marriage, despite using the kind of vulgar sexual language
that many of his conservative role models would have had his show banned
for in previous culture wars. His role as an editor at _Vice_ led to him
being referred to as one of the ‘primary architects of hipsterdom’, but
he went on to make his name on the right through his anti-feminist
arguments that life in the modern workplace had made women miserable and
that the dominant media ideology teaches women to be fat, single and
childless. He had to step down as chief creative officer of Rooster, an
advertising agency start-up he cofounded, following the publication of
an essay entitled ‘Transphobia is Perfectly Natural’.

Lauren Southern, the other major star of Rebel who later went
independent, rose to fame when she attended a SlutWalk in Vancouver with
the sign ‘There Is No Rape Culture In The West’. She was perfect for Vox
Pops as a telegenic young blonde woman with a sarcastic disapproving
tone of voice. At another protest, Southern shouted ‘there are only two
genders’, before a protester poured a container of urine over her head.
Southern was also heavily involved in ‘The Triggering’ in response to
International Women’s Day, in which anti-feminist Twitter users posted
intentionally offensive content to assert their right to free speech
online. At the time of writing, one reposted version of her protest
footage that popped up in my YouTube recommendations called ‘Social
Justice Warriors Piss On Your Free Speech – Lauren Southern Attacked’
had nearly 500,000 views. She has 235,000 followers on Twitter and
occasionally appears on mainstream news media like Sky News, where she
was kicked off live on air for saying:

I don’t know why legal immigration even exists anymore. I could just put
on some bronzer, get on a dinghy boat and show up on the border of
Sicily or the beaches of Sicily with a Koran in hand and be accepted as
an immigrant. Or go across the border with Caracas and be accepted as an
immigrant.

_Breitbart_ has been one of the key players in the Trumpian right
culture war, a conservative website founded as recently as 2007 by
conservative commentator Andrew Breitbart. It also has a daily radio
program called _Breitbart News Daily_. It is perhaps the single biggest
success story of right-wing alternative media, with celebrities like
Milo, its editor Steve Bannon rising to the top of US politics and its
staff writers rising from relative obscurity to having meetings with the
president. Bannon himself described the site as a ‘platform for the
alt-right’, though he undoubtedly meant this in the looser sense of a
new anti-establishment right, aligned with the European populist right
and the US Trumpian right.

After the election, Buzzfeed published a transcript of a long interview
Steve Bannon gave to the Vatican from 2004. Presumably thinking this was
a ready-made hit-piece that would destroy his reputation, Bannon came
across in the interview as darkly fascinating and, relative to many
Buzzfeed listicle writers, as quite a serious and intriguing person. He
spoke of ‘the crisis of capitalism’, secularization, the Islamization of
the West, the immorality of crony capitalism and the destruction of the
West’s Judeo-Christian heritage. Contrary to what Buzzfeed may have
intended, it revealed a thinker who could not be further from the
neoconservative or neoliberal establishments within the two major US
parties, but instead as an anti-establishment figure with ambitious
ideas.

Ben Shapiro was a key media figure to leave _Breitbart_ over its
flirtations with the anti-Semitic hard alt-right. Shapiro wrote that
under Bannon’s leadership, _‘Breitbart_ has become the alt-right go-to
website… pushing white ethno-nationalism as a legitimate response to
political correctness, and the comment section turning into a cesspool
for white supremacist mememakers.’ This sparked an anti-Semitic hate
campaign against Shapiro, which he strongly implied was actively
encouraged by Milo. After his second son was born, Shapiro received
tweets and comments with wishes that ‘all 4 of you will go to the
ovens’. Among Milo’s many digs at Shapiro, he tweeted a photo of a black
baby at him after his son was born and wrote, ‘Prayers to Ben who had to
see his baby come out half-black. And already taller than he is!’ – a
reference to his new status as a ‘cuckservative’.

Cathy Young, a Russian Jewish US citizen, a libertarian commentator and
writer for _Reason_ magazine, had once been a fellow traveler of Milo
and gamergate. However, she went on to cut ties with anyone too close to
the alt-right as she began to see the same anti-Semitic and sinister
elements grow and go unchallenged by those whose ascendant careers
depended upon not punching right. At the time Milo’s star was ascending,
everyone wanted to know about some youth movement called the alt-right
and he was enraged by her principled position when she and Milo were
interviewed on BBC radio. His fans mocked and abused her but today,
since Milo’s career has been destroyed, to the indifference or even glee
of the alt-right he was promoting, Young has emerged with her dignity
intact, as the much wiser and more principled, astute critic.

Milo was undoubtedly the biggest star to emerge from the rise of the
Trumpian online right. The British gay commentator started as a young
and more recognizably conservative figure using the pseudonym Milo
Andreas Wagner. In an early TV appearance on the _10 O’clock Show_ in
the UK, a young, slightly shy, brown-haired Milo, dressed like someone
from a _Belle and Sebastian_ video, discussed gay marriage with Boy
George and the host David Mitchell. He was introduced as a conservative
Catholic. At that stage he hadn’t quite found his brand and it would
have been impossible to know what a star he would become. He later
founded _The Kernel_, an online tabloid magazine about technology,
reinventing himself as a much more modern kind of tech and culture
writer. He achieved mainstream fame and celebrity status in 2014, when
he sympathetically covered gamergate. Milo has done more than anyone
else to give the alt-right a presentable face, giving even their worst
fascistic incarnations positive coverage, despite himself being Jewish,
gay, etc. Right before the scandal that ended his career, he had
appeared on Bill Maher’s show and had signed a $250,000 book deal.

His real media achievement in terms of Gramscian-right tactics and
thinking was his Dangerous Faggot Tour. If you watched a live stream of
the tour the live comments section quickly filled up little walls,
swastikas and references to Harambe. These videos were viewed typically
hundreds of thousands of times, as he visited US and UK universities
criticizing political correctness, feminism, Islam, Black Lives Matter
and Western liberalism in general. Through courting online controversy
and campus activists constantly trying to ban him, he was made into a
kind of martyr figure, with devoted crowds of fans chanting ‘Milo! Milo!
Milo!’ His ban from Twitter aided his career in much the same way. As
for genuine non-ironic white supremacists on the alt-right, he insisted:
‘There’s just not very many of them, no-one really likes them, and
they’re unlikely to achieve anything significant in the alt-right.’ Just
a few months later, Milo’s career was destroyed seemingly by the right
itself as a years-old clip from an interview in which he defended
pederasty was dredged up and many of the staff at _Breitbart_ said they
would quit if he was not fired from the magazine as a result. The hard
alt-right who he said would never have influence are now stronger and
more confident than ever, while his career is in free fall, and after
the revelations came out Richard Spencer tweeted ‘Milo’s done. Put a
fork in him.’

Mike Cernovich is another major figure in the alt-light milieu, who
currently has 222,000 followers on Twitter and has published popular
guides to right-wing politics and male assertiveness, Gorilla Mindset
and MAGA Mindset. He developed his media profile through Twitter,
periscope videos and blogging at the website Danger and Play, a
reference to Nietzsche’s famous quote, ‘The true man wants two things:
danger and play. For that reason he wants woman, as the most dangerous
plaything.’ A profile written in the _New Yorker_ claimed that he
launched Danger and Play after his first wife filed for divorce and that
they had been law students together. After law school, his wife became a
successful attorney in Silicon Valley, while Cernovich was not admitted
to the California bar until nine years after getting his law degree.
Cernovich admitted that his wife earned millions of dollars in stocks
and that he received ‘seven figures’ of her money in the divorce
settlement, which explains his ability to build an independent media
career.

Another important figure in this milieu is conspiracy theorist Alex
Jones, founder of Infowars, whose tagline is: ‘There’s a war on for your
mind!’ _The Alex Jones Show_ airs on the radio across the US and online.
He has accused the US government of orchestrating the Oklahoma City
bombing, the September 11th attacks and a fake moon landing. Somewhat
like a right-wing version of the anti-capitalist anti-globalization
movement the rose up in the 90s, he believes that globalists have
colluded to create a New World Order. The Southern Poverty Law Center
describes him as ‘the most prolific conspiracy theorist in contemporary
America’ and though his crazed shirt-ripping style is easy to laugh at,
his YouTube channel gets millions of viewers, now reaching a mainstream
audience.

One of the only strictly alt-right figures to rival the popularity and
mainstream media attention of the alt-light, though later and in part as
a result of their initial success, was Richard Spencer. He effectively
coined the term alt-right and made the ‘red pilled’ metaphor more common
across the broad Trumpian right. Spencer has said, ‘Race is something
between a breed and an actual species’ and believes non-white Americans
should leave in a ‘peaceful ethnic cleansing’. He held a certain
fascination for the media as the full ugliness and horror of the
alt-right was exposed after Trump’s election. This was in part because
he was surprisingly young, even ‘dapper’, articulate and well dressed
for an Internet fascist – obviously a modest compliment, but he was
certainly far from the typical ‘neckbeard’ stereotype.

Spencer believes the alt-right will continue to infiltrate mainstream US
formal politics through culture, starting with a focus on deporting
undocumented immigrants under Trump, later moving on to negative
migration as a goal and eventually on to a white ethnostate. He once
told Mother Jones: ‘Conservatism is going to be dead in my lifetime and
the question is, who is going to define the right after that? I want to
do that.’ Spencer started out as a scholar of Leo Strauss and his MA
thesis was on Adorno and Wagner, but he later dropped out of his Duke
University Ph.D. You can still detect in his writing and public speeches
that he longs for a more intellectual European style of blood and soil
nationalism and he said in an interview that he used to want to be an
avant-garde theater director. He speaks with spitting disdain about the
vulgarity of the US consumer culture-loving, Big-Mac munching,
Bush-voting, pick-up truck owning pro-war Republican style. His writing
style comes across as that of a person who might wear surgical gloves
when leaving the house.

Spencer had worked at _The American Conservative_, a high-quality
anti-war anti-establishment conservative magazine, before being fired
for his extreme views and moving to _Taki’s Magazine_, where he used the
term ‘alt-right’ regularly. After Hillary named the alt-right in a
speech during the elections, Spencer finally achieved mainstream media
exposure, featuring especially in liberal left-leaning publications like
_Vice_.

Spencer regards Trump as someone who will accelerate the collapse of US
multicultural feminist liberalism, calling him after his election ‘the
Napoleon of the current year’. When Trump got elected, in the first
national meeting of his organization the National Policy Institute,
Spencer saluted the crowd of about 300 people with ‘Hail Trump, hail our
people, hail victory!’ as a few crowd members did a Nazi salute.
Interestingly though, this overt declaration of the alt-right Trump
alliance as a fascist or at least far-right racial project sparked anger
among some alt-light figures like Mike Cernovich, who came out against
Spencer and his online followers, saying that Spencer was part of a
government project of ‘controlled opposition’ – a plant presumably used
to discredit all opposition to establishment Republican Party
neoconservatism as fascist. Cernovich broke from the alt-right code
‘don’t punch to the right’ after the footage of Spencer and his
followers blew up. He insulted the entire core of the white nationalist
alt-right, calling anti-Semite public figure David Duke a ‘reprobate
gambler’ and ‘conman’.

While this disparate set of young rightist social media celebrities was
held together through pure hatred of their opposition in the mainstream
media and the political center, the divisions within the broader orbit
of the alt-right started to appear almost instantly, with the success of
Trump and their sudden mainstream exposure. This is of course an old
story that should be familiar to anyone who knows the history of any
marginal political movements that suddenly achieve mainstream success.
Their Gramscian strategy has been successful beyond any predictions;
though much of it emerged from the chaos of a crumbling political and
media mainstream.

One thing that can’t be denied is their remarkable success in spreading
their ideas through their own alternative and almost exclusively online
media content in the absence of traditional media, political
establishment bodies or other institutional support. It appears as
though in the online culture wars, those heeding the ideas of the left
most closely, from Chomsky’s idea of manufacturing consent to Gramsci’s
theory of hegemony and counter-hegemony, and applying them most
strategically, were the right.



CHAPTER FOUR



CONSERVATIVE CULTURE WARS FROM BUCHANAN TO YIANNOPOULOS


Where does the most mainstream wing of the alt-right – the alt-light –
fit historically in terms of its political ideas and style? Throughout
the US presidential race, Milo Yiannopoulos regularly reiterated that he
loved ‘Daddy’ (Donald Trump), because he was ‘the first truly cultural
candidate since Pat Buchanan’. He admitted in a _Bloomberg_ profile that
he doesn’t ‘care about politics’ and has reiterated this point
explicitly on several occasions, but is instead interested in the
cultural battles that are shaping it.

It seems to me that politics, on the contrary, has been hollowed out too
much into _little other_ than a purely cultural politics over the last
half-century, which the ugly spectacle of the Trump-Hillary race
represented the logical conclusion of – politics as culture war. It was
just that until Trump and the emergence of the new online right, the
liberals had been resoundingly winning. In this style of politics, what
a political leader actually does often seems entirely secondary to what
cultural politics they profess to have. In modern politics, liberal
leaders are forgiven for drone bombing as long as they’re cool with gay
marriage, while on the right, enacting policies that devastate families
and stable communities was cheered on at any cost as long as it dealt a
satisfying blow to the trade unions, as we saw during the Reagan and
Thatcher years. For both Yiannopoulos and his online liberal enemies in
the culture wars, essentially two rival wings of contemporary identity
politics, to be said to have purely cultural politics would not be
considered particularly pejorative.

Nevertheless, Yiannopoulos’s comparison is an interesting one. Buchanan
is perhaps most famous for his declaration of ‘a war for the soul of
America’ during his famous speech before the 1992 Republican National
Convention. In his invocation of Buchanan, Yiannopoulos was drawing a
parallel between his own anti-PC Trumpian culture war online and that of
the conservative culture war of the 90s. Buchanan’s speech was itself a
delayed backlash to the previous culture war of the 60s and the
devastating cultural losses suffered by conservatives that resulted.

In positioning his own highly mediated war with the new wave of identity
politics sweeping the Anglophone world in recent years as the
contemporary equivalent of Buchanan’s, Yiannopoulos was weaving himself
into a broader historic narrative. In this narrative, he and the new
online Trumpian trolling right are leading another great push, as
important as the culture wars of the 60s and of the 90s, only this time
with a bit of youth and Internet subcultural cool on their side. Whether
his career can survive the incriminating interview in which he defended
pederasty remains to be seen, but he played an enormously important role
in the culture wars that shaped the period in the years leading up to
the election of Trump. So, looking at his statements and speeches on his
Dangerous Faggot Tour and Buchanan’s, how much do each of their culture
wars really have in common?

Buchanan’s book _Death of The West_ has been hugely influential on the
paleoconservative ideas that have rivaled those of the pro-market
modernizing neocons. He called neoconservatism ‘a globalist,
interventionist, open borders ideology.’ Through American Conservative,
he and other like-minded anti-establishment conservatives opposed the
Iraq War and took many other positions that distinguished them from the
internationalist, free market, and pro-interventionist components of the
right. Long before Trump’s election Buchanan was talking about the white
working class as naturally conservative, opposed globalization and
neoliberal trade deals, and pushed for a crack down on immigration.
While the neocons had their origins in the materialism of the
anti-Soviet left, Buchanan also stressed the non-material questions of
patriotism, the nation, family, community and cultural inheritance.

With some reservations he supported Trump saying: ‘The idea of economic
nationalism, an end to globalism, putting America first in trade,
securing the border, one nation, one people—I’m still a conservative
Republican, but this is the new and enlarged agenda.’ When asked if he
considered himself connected to the alt-right, he said: ‘They’re much
younger, they’re basically guys in their twenties and thirties. Some
people I know walked out of it—they’re not into _Sieg Heil_, they’re not
into this stuff… the media loves this stuff, they can’t get enough of
it.’

The conservative culture war of the 90s had tried to push back against
the enormous gains of the cultural left over abortion, affirmative
action, art, censorship, evolution, family values, feminism, pornography
and the Western canon. Buchanan’s style was more pugilistic than most of
the Republican mainstream was willing to risk and his culture war speech
remains an undeniably brilliant piece of writing and oratory, as well as
one of the most important speeches in US history. The speech was a
defense of Ronald Reagan and, after losing the presidential nomination
himself, a defense of the Republican nominee George Bush senior. But
primarily it was really a call to engage in a larger culture war: ‘There
is a religious war going on in this country. It is a cultural war, as
critical to the kind of nation we shall be as was the Cold War itself,
for this war is for the soul of America.’

The right-wing style that Yiannopoulos embodied represents a marriage of
the ironic, irreverent, taboo-busting culture of 4chan with the politics
of the right; although, as his hard alt-right detractors often liked to
point out, once you remove the ‘trolling’, many of his views amount to
little more than classical liberalism. Despite calling himself a
conservative he, Trump, rightist 4chan and the alt-right all represent a
pretty dramatic departure from the kind of churchgoing, upstanding,
button-down, family-values conservatism that we usually associate with
the term in Anglo-American public and political life.

As a bursting forth of the id unrestrained by conventions of speech or
PC culture, the whole online sensibility is more in the spirit of
foul-mouthed comment-thread trolls than it is of Bible study, more
_Fight Club_ than family values, more in line with the Marquis de Sade
than Edmund Burke. It is sometimes said that the right won the economic
war and the left won the culture war. And as political theorist Walter
Benn Michaels has argued, it is the recognition of identity that has
triumphed over economic equality as the organizing principle of the
Anglo-American liberal left and of mainstream discourse more broadly.

In full agreement with him, I would also argue that the most recent rise
of the online right is evidence of the triumph of the identity politics
of the right and of the co-opting (but nevertheless the triumph) of 60s
left styles of transgression and counterculture. The libertinism,
individualism, bourgeois bohemianism, postmodernism, irony and
ultimately the nihilism that the left was once accused of by the right
actually characterized the movement to which Milo belonged. The rise of
Milo’s 4chan-influenced right is no more evidence of a resurgence of
conservatism than the rise of Tumblr-style identity politics constitutes
a resurgence of the socialist or materialist left.

As Andrew Hartman writes in _A War for the Soul of America_, in
Buchanan’s speech the invocation of the fall of Soviet Communism
indicated how at the end of the Cold War the Soviet enemy _without_ had
become the bohemian, transgressive, permissive enemy _within_ for the US
right. Reagan had overseen the defeat of the Soviet Union, the speech
suggested, but more important now was the defeat of what had come out of
the 60s, including what critic Lionel Trilling called ‘adversary
culture’ within the West itself.

The 60s were bitterly remembered by conservatives like Buchanan, when
counterculture brought the bohemian styles of the Beats to the
mainstream and student revolts broke out from Paris to California.
Trilling’s ‘adversary culture’, an idea that preoccupied the right at
the time, meant a political or intellectual culture that sought to
counter and subvert the existing order, and smash that which went
before, often through irreverence and transgression for transgression’s
sake, and later in the more respectable world of academia. Though it
became a term to describe the post-60s academic takeover, it is
remarkably similar to how Yiannopoulos himself was described as he rose
to prominence (transgressive, subversive, speaking truth to power,
exposing lies, etc.) even as he identified academe as the problem at the
root of millennial cultural liberalism.

Many of the key thinkers of the 60s moment were interested in something
that later characterized the online irreverent anti-PC right –
non-conformism. In his book _White Collar: The American Middle Classes_,
C. Wright Mills depicted the post-war US as a dystopian iron cage of
conformity. His readers envisioned an alternative or antidote by
creating a counterculture of nonconformity, individuality and rebellion.
Another hugely influential anti-conformist thinker of the time, Paul
Goodman, advocated anti-authoritarianism, experimental psychology and a
rejection of social restrictions and taboos in _Growing Up Absurd: The
Problems of Youth in the Organized Society_. Antipathy to duty, the work
ethic, the bureaucratic straightjacket, the company man, the square, had
come from the Beats, and fused with the anti-war and student movements
to form the New Left.

It is significant here too that, despite the constant accusations of
‘Cultural Marxism’ by the Trumpian online right, the countercultural
aesthetics of anti-conformism in the US were later cultivated by the US
government as part of a culture war against communism. Through the
Congress for Cultural Freedom, a covert cultural soft-power initiative,
it was the Cold War anti-communist liberals who used non-conformism,
self-expression and individualism to rival the collectivist, conformist,
productivist and heavily restricted Soviet Union, which still revered
the uniformed pre-60s anti-individualist forms of culture like army
choirs, marching bands, orchestras and ballet. By the time Buchanan gave
his speech in 1992, the Cold War was over and the economic program of
the Western democratic left had suffered a catastrophic defeat during
the Reagan and Thatcher years. However, the socially and morally
permissive, transgressive, nonconformist cultural project within the US
New Left had by then emerged triumphant and, as it turned out, coexisted
quite comfortably with the scorched-earth free-market economics of the
right – a fusion that reached its fullest expression in the
Blair/Clinton era, when a non-conformist cultural gesture could still
cover a multitude of economic sins.

Recent online culture wars have reopened many fault lines within the
right as well as the left. Anti-Trump conservatives of today are deemed
‘cuckservatives’ by the alt-right, the passive cuckolding husband to the
rapacious non-white foreign enemy at the gates. The neocon and
old-fashioned Christian right is hated in this way by the alt-right for,
in one way or another, failing to protect the nation aggressively
enough, by playing too nicely and thus not being up to the job of
defeating feminism, Islamification, mass immigration and so on. In stark
contrast to the Pepe-posters and potty-mouthed Milo fans would be
someone like British conservative columnist Peter Hitchens, for example,
who called Trump ‘this yahoo, this bully, this groper, a man who
threatened his opponent with jail… I loathe Mr. Trump for his
coarseness, his crudity, and his scorn for morals, tradition and law.’
In this sense Trump remains closer to the sensibilities of Yiannopoulos
and the trolling online right than he does to conservatism or to
something like _National Review_ magazine, founded by William F.
Buckley, which came out against him. During his campaign whole
cross-sections of conservatives came out as ‘Never Trump’.

To understand these fault lines it is worth remembering that after the
cultural revolution of the 60s in the US, it wasn’t the old-fashioned
conservatives (whose entire way of being was seen as hopelessly square
and un-modern) who really succeeded in taking on the cultural left but
the much more intellectually equipped and rhetorically gifted
neoconservatives. _Partisan Review_ magazine, also a project of the
anti-communist Cold War left soft-power CCF initiative, published an
essay by Norman Podhoretz about the ‘the know-nothing bohemians’. In it,
he described ‘the beat generation’s worship of primitivism and
spontaneity’ that suggested a desire to ‘kill those incomprehensible
characters who are capable of getting seriously involved with a woman, a
job, a cause.’

As Hartman elucidates in his book, many of the early neocons were New
York Jewish intellectuals who had come to politics in the 30s through
the City College of New York. These were smart, often working-class
Jewish students who started out as Trotskyists and learned their style
of debate in CCNY cafeteria’s Alcove No. 1, where they argued with the
Moscow-loyal communist students who occupied Alcove No. 2. During their
later rightward turn, they worked on magazines _Commentary_ and
_Encounter_, the latter becoming the literary organ for the anti-Soviet
soft-power CCF. This period produced writers and polemicists like
Gertrude Himmelfarb and Irving Kristol.

Hartman also writes that even as they turned to the right they
‘developed habits of mind that never atrophied’ like their ‘combative
spirit, sweeping declarations and suspicion of leftist dogma. They
maintained their Marxist style of diagnosing problems in relation to
root causes, internal logics and overarching structures.’ Having been
Trotskyists themselves endowed them with an intuitive ability to
critique the dogma of the left in a way that the churchgoing Christian
conservative establishment couldn’t. Similarly today, the troll-y
version of the right that Milo represents is able to fight the new
online identity politics in a way that actual conservatives are not able
to. They understand the value of transgression, edginess and
counterculture often better than their left-wing opponents.

What constitutes movements of the right and left in Anglophone culture
wars discourse is based on a political compass that has long been
reorienting, rethinking and reconstituting itself. In particular, class
politics and social liberalism have not always sat comfortably together,
nor did social conservatism with free-market economics for many decades
until the neocons perfected the formula when in power. As Hartman
reminds us, Christian figures like William Jennings Bryan merged
concerns about the family with criticisms of capitalism, while before
the 60s, American Prairie radicals organized under a populist banner
against corporate monopolies and crony capitalism. Large numbers of
workers joined trade unions in response to the Great Depression. Ideas
of transgression and cultural radicalism were largely irrelevant to this
working-class left. The 1962 Port Huron statement, the manifesto of the
Students for a Democratic Society, contained a very different kind of
message: ‘We are people of this generation, bred in at least modest
comfort, housed now in universities, looking uncomfortably at the world
we inherit.’ By the 1972 presidential campaign, the American Federation
of Labor and Congress of Industrial Organizations abstained from
supporting the Democratic candidate McGovern, because they saw him as a
sell-out to identity politics. This was because of the party’s adoption
of ‘New Politics’, designed to bring identity groups to the forefront of
politics while moving away from the centrality of economic inequality.

New Left thinker Herbert Marcuse meanwhile raised the question of
‘whether it is possible to conceive of revolution when there is no vital
need for it’. The need for revolution, he explained, ‘is something quite
different from a vital need for better working conditions, a better
income, more liberty and so on, which can be satisfied within the
existing order. Why should the overthrow of the existing order be of
vital necessity for people who own, or can hope to own, good clothes, a
well-stocked larder, a TV set, a car, a house and so on, all within the
existing order?’ In Marx’s formulation, capitalism would lead to
immiseration and so it was the urban industrial proletariat was was
destined to be the revolutionary class. However, in the affluent
society, according to Marcuse, the two great historical forces of the
modern world, the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, ‘no longer appear to
be agents of historical transformation’. The working class had,
according to many who shared this view, ceased being revolutionary and
instead were becoming reactionary and culturally conservative, while the
identity movements along race, gender and sexuality lines were becoming
more radical than ever.

In academia, the ‘cultural turn’ saw a radical shift in scholarship
whereby universities made culture the focus of contemporary debates. It
also meant a shift in emphasis toward meaning and away from a positivist
epistemology of discerning objective truth. Despite attempts to use the
anti-postmodern language of real conservatives at times, Milo and his
4chan troll fans are in many ways the perfect postmodern offspring,
where every statement is wrapped in layers of faux-irony, playfulness
and multiple cultural nods and references.

Yiannopoulos’s main enemy throughout his period of popularity in the US
has been, above all else, feminism, so much so that he gained attention
when he ran a quiz on Twitter asking his followers if they’d prefer to
have (a) feminism or (b) cancer. Later, he adopted the slogan ‘Feminism
is cancer’, which became available as a line of T-shirts. He regularly
describes feminists as fat and his favorite choice of insult,
‘lesbianic’. Here, he and Buchanan would find some common ground, but
Buchanan and his fellow culture warriors believed that women’s
liberation and gay liberation were part of the same disease. This twin
enemy loomed large in Buchanan’s culture-wars speech as a measure of the
moral decline of US society. Wrongly regarding Hillary Clinton as a
radical, as opposed to a thoroughly establishment baby boomer, he
attacked her as well as Bill, saying:

This, my friends, is radical feminism. The agenda that Clinton & Clinton
would impose on America – abortion on demand, a litmus test for the
Supreme Court, homosexual rights, discrimination against religious
schools, women in combat units – that’s change, all right. But it is not
the kind of change America needs. It is not the kind of change America
wants. And it is not the kind of change we can abide in a nation that we
still call God’s country.

When the Aids crisis hit, Buchanan wrote ‘poor homosexuals… they have
declared war upon nature and now nature is exacting an awful
retribution.’ The Stonewall riots of 1969 and the emergence of The Gay
Liberation Front had profoundly changed sex in Western culture in ways
that conservatives deeply regretted. Milo was part of a movement against
overprotected students, but university campuses dropping their _in loco
parentis_ policies to protect the virginity of students was a major loss
to the conservative establishment at the time. The acceptance of
homosexuality had been part of a much broader freeing up of sexuality
that both Milo and his Tumblr-dwelling gender fluid enemies continue to
take influence from in different ways. _Time_ magazine covered The
Sexual Freedom League in 1966 and _The Joy of Sex_ was published in
1972. Sexual revolution philosopher Norman O. Brown argued that by
repressing our desire for ‘polymorphous perversity’ we had wrongly
chosen the ‘civilization’ bargain in Freud’s formulation.

Though Milo may seek to celebrate gay men and diminish feminism, gay and
women’s liberation have together loomed large in the conservative
imagination as part of a declension narrative of Western civilization.
The obsession with decline found on the alt-right today comes from a
long conservative line of thought, who regularly drew upon books like
Edward Gibbon’s _The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman
Empire_, the eighteenth-century text that tied Rome’s collapse to sexual
decadence. Camille Paglia’s work, greatly admired by Milo, is
preoccupied with this same causal link between homosexuality,
promiscuity, gender fluidity and civilizational decline. Neocon Gertrude
Himmelfarb also used her scholarship of Victorian Britain to suggest
that Western civilization had weathered the storm of modernity only
because of its Victorian values, which had collapsed in the 60s owing to
gay liberation and the sexual revolution.

In Yiannopoulos’s speeches he made regular reference to partying and
drinking, sometimes joking about drug-taking. He can barely go a few
sentences without mentioning his homosexuality, anal sex jokes, and what
sounds like a multitude of black sexual partners and boyfriends. Joking
with Ann Coulter on his podcast, he said that he liked the idea of
getting caught in bed with black drug-dealer boyfriends when he was
rebelling against his parents. In one of his campus talks he dressed up
as a camped up S&M cop to antagonize Black Lives Matter and had
penis-shaped props.

In response to criticisms of his intentionally cruel bullying attacks on
others, he simply shrugged them off as examples of fabulous catty gay
male behavior. 4chan is also more of a product of the sexual revolution
than of conservatism. From the start it was teeming with weird hardcore
pornographic images and discussions – gay, straight, transgender and
everything in between – and a culture of relish transgressing any and
all moral codes when it comes to sexuality.

After the Islamist massacre in a gay nightclub in Orlando, Florida in
2016, Yiannopoulos traveled there to address a mourning crowd. He not
only chose the moment to make the case against Muslim immigration, but
also in favor of gun ownership – a very US-centric and perhaps
conveniently acquired issue of little concern to British conservatives.
The pro-gun cause would of course have enormous appeal to the right, but
Yiannopoulos was also channeling a radical precedent like the black call
to arms ‘Negroes With Guns’ by Robert F. Williams, which influenced the
Black Panthers and other black self-defense militants.

On his podcast he also said that going to mass was the most ‘punk’ thing
to do and that gays being accepted as part of mainstream society was
‘boring’. In the online and on-campus culture war that Yiannopoulos
fought, gays were no longer considered the harbingers of civilizational
decline, while the finger of blame continued to be pointed at feminism
and multiculturalism. Instead, he positioned gays as the saviors of
civilization using many of the right’s own ideas. On his campus tour he
argued that gays are genetically destined to be the high-achieving
protectors of Western civilization against feminism and Islam. Many
conservatives who opposed gay liberation for decades suddenly embraced
Milo’s camp outrageousness in the name of kicking back against a common
enemy by any means necessary. But in the end, when he had served his
purpose in attracting to young rebels to the right, his outrageous
sexual comments and camp demeanor proved too much of a liability.

Unlike Milo and his followers, Buchanan was also a supporter of
censorship, especially for pornography, and in his culture-wars speech
he said: ‘we stand with President Bush in favor of the right of small
towns and communities to control the raw sewage of pornography that so
terribly pollutes our popular culture.’ It’s hard to imagine anything
farther from the free-speech absolutism, the potty-mouthed black anal
sex jokes, and the defense of rudeness against the ‘pearl clutchers’ of
Yiannopoulos’s camp persona and his cosmopolitan multicultural
background.

He has acknowledged this distinction, saying:

The alt-right for me is primarily a cultural reaction to the nannying
and language policing and authoritarianism of the progressive left—the
stranglehold that it has on culture. It is primarily—like Trump is and
like I am—a reaction against the progressive left doing today what the
religious right was doing in the 90s—which is trying to police what can
be thought and said, how opinions can be expressed.

In the culture wars Yiannopoulos invokes, Buchanan and the right _were_
the chief anti-free speech pearl clutchers. Meanwhile, Andrea Dworkin
and Catharine MacKinnon led the charge for censorship of pornography
from the feminist side. Part of the success of the backlash against
feminism in the 80s and 90s was as a result of the coalition with the
historically doomed moral conservatives on their joint challenge to
rising sexual libertinism in Western culture. On his show _The Firing
Line_, William F. Buckley agreed with Andrea Dworkin on banning
pornography. If one imagines where Milo would line up politically in
terms of the infamous William F. Buckley v Gore Vidal televised
presidential debates of 1968, it would probably be closer to that of
Vidal, whose libertinism and mischievous gay rhetorical style was so
abhorrent to Buckley.

The alt-right have described their movement as a reaction against
establishment US conservatism, saying that there is a ‘deep continuity’
between the Buckleyite movement and the neocons. Spencer has also said,
‘The left is the right and the alt-right is the new left’ and that
‘We’re the ones thinking the impossible. We’re the ones thinking the
unthinkable.’ On _Radix Journal_ they draw on the idea of the ‘The
Fourth Political Theory’, with reference to the Russian theorist
Aleksandr Dugin and the French New Right’s Alain de Benoist, an entirely
new political ideology that integrates and supersedes liberal democracy,
Marxism and fascism. Right-wing voices that claim to have been purged
from the conservative movement, like Peter Brimelow and John Derbyshire,
have formed part of the alt-right. It primarily opposes establishment
political conservatism, as Kevin DeAnna explained in his influential
essay for the alt-right, ‘The Impossibility of Conservatism’.

The alt-right also seeks to destroy more than it proposes to build,
unlike the institution-building and tradition-preserving ethos of the
Burkean conservative movement, and seeks to smash some of the most
treasured parts of US conservatism in particular, namely US
exceptionalism – the notion dating back to Alexis de Tocqueville’s
_Democracy In America_ of the US’s unique founding on an idea rather
than a blood and soil national identity. Vox Day’s ‘America is not an
idea’ or articles like ‘Ideas didn’t build America’ in _The Right
Stuff_, or VDARE’s ‘the “proposition nation” myth’ all hammer this
point.

In the end, Buchanan was one of the paleocons to back Trump and many of
those who formerly loathed most of what Yiannopoulos and what he
represented decided to change their minds and back the winning horse,
not only of Trump, but also of the new libertines of the online
irreverent ‘punk’ right. Having lost Buchanan’s conservative culture
war, they were perhaps strategically right to calculate that the only
way they can ever have at least some of their ideas heard again would be
to back a groping, lecherous, godless presidential candidate and a
libertine figure such as Yiannopoulos and his army of online racist,
foul-mouthed, porn-loving nihilists, who in many ways represent
everything people like Buchanan are supposed to stand against. The rise
of Milo, Trump and the alt-right are not evidence of the return of the
conservatism, but instead of the absolute hegemony of the culture of
non-conformism, self-expression, transgression and irreverence for its
own sake – an aesthetic that suits those who believe in nothing but the
liberation of the individual and the id, whether they’re on the left or
the right. The principle-free idea of counterculture did not go away; it
has just become the style of the new right.



CHAPTER FIVE



FROM TUMBLR TO THE CAMPUS WARS: CREATING SCARCITY IN AN ONLINE ECONOMY OF VIRTUE


There are many potential explanations for the emergence of a new right
sensibility among a younger generation, which rapidly shifted the range
of acceptable discourse further to the right than anyone could have
imagined. One is that long before it bubbled up to the surface of
college campuses, and even Twitter and YouTube, it developed, in
opposition to its enemy online culture of the new identity politics
typified by platforms like Tumblr. They tried to move the culture in the
opposite direction by restricting speech on the right but expanding the
Overton window on the left when it came to issues of race and gender,
making increasingly anti-male, anti-white, anti-straight, anti-cis
rhetoric normal on the cultural left. The liberal online culture
typified by Tumblr was equally successful in pushing fringe ideas into
the mainstream. It was ultra-sensitive in contrast to the shocking
irreverence of chan culture, but equally subcultural and radical.

In the aftermath of the Trump election, divisions within the broad
‘left’ became more prominent than ever. In particular, the animosity and
deeper philosophical differences between the liberal left and the
materialist left played out in insults being flung in both directions.
Embittered that Hillary lost or that ‘Bernie would have won’ the
socialists were labeled ‘brocialists’ and dismissed as arrogant ‘white
dudes’, and in retaliation they hit back at preachy, performatively
‘woke’ Tumblr-style identity politics that they felt had destroyed the
left. As well as brocialists and Berniebros, this milieu was even
labeled ‘alt-left’. An account of this schism within ‘the left’, and an
attempt to capture the online left identity politics culture that was
every bit as influential, diffuse, multiplatform and constantly shifting
as its rival culture on the right, is worth sketching out here.

Mainstream newsreading audiences were baffled when Facebook revealed it
was offering over 50 gender options for its members to choose from in
2014 and around the same time the campus wars over safe spaces, trigger
warnings, no-platforming and gender pronouns emerged. But the social
media corporation was merely taking its cue from online subcultures that
had been emerging for years before, and the youth political subcultures
that had created them and emerged out of them. The main preoccupation of
this new culture (the right named them SJWs and snowflakes, let’s call
it Tumblr-liberalism) was gender fluidity and providing a safe space to
explore other concerns like mental ill-health, physical disability,
race, cultural identity and ‘intersectionality’ – the now standard
academic term for recognition of multiple varieties of intersecting
marginalizations and oppressions. While the roots of this whole
political sensibility may be found in academia and activist culture, its
emergence into the mainstream that led to Hillary using terms like
‘check your privilege’ and ‘intersectionality’ was the culmination of
years of online development on Tumblr, in fan cultures, on previous
platforms like LiveJournal and on a mixture of social media.

Although one could trace various threads to a multitude of different
online and offline points of origin, Tumblr was one of the most
important platforms for the emergence of a whole political and aesthetic
sensibility, developing its own vocabulary and style – very much the
reverse mirror image of rightist 4chan in this way. It was here that
what Walter Benn Michaels criticized as a liberal preference for
‘recognition of diversity over economic inequality’ reached its most
absurd apotheosis with a politics based on the minutia and gradations of
rapidly proliferating identities, and the emotional injuries of systemic
cultural prejudices. Symbolic representative diversity and recognition
became its goals, as it admonished transgressors for ‘erasing my
identity’ and urged white/straight/male/cis people to ‘listen’ and
‘believe’. If the generation of college-going millennials that followed
the rise of this online culture could be described, as they are today by
the conservative press in particular, as ‘generation snowflake’, Tumblr
was their vanguard.

‘One is not born, but rather becomes, a woman,’ wrote French feminist
and philosopher Simone de Beauvoir in 1949. By 1990, Judith Butler had
taken this several steps further, or perhaps more literally, in _Gender
Trouble: Feminism and the subversion of identity_, in which she argued
that the coherence of the categories of sex, gender and sexuality were
entirely culturally constructed through the repetition of styled and
cultivated bodily acts, which created the appearance of an essential
ontological ‘core’ gender.

By the early 2010s, Tumblr had put Butler’s theory into practice and
created an entire subcultural language, set of slogans and style to go
with it. The most marked preoccupation of Tumblr’s cultural politics has
been identity fluidity, typically but not exclusively around gender. It
was the subcultural digital expression of the fruition of Judith
Butler’s ideas. For years, the microblogging site filled up with stories
of young people explaining and discussing the entirely socially
constructed nature of gender and potentially limitless choice of genders
that an individual can identify as or move between.

The following are just a few of the ever-expanding list of genders, now
in the hundreds, all taken directly from Tumblr:

Alexigender – Gender identity that is fluid between more than one
gender, but the individual cannot tell what those genders are.

Ambigender – A feeling of two genders simultaneously, but without
fluidity/shifting. May be used synonymously in some cases with bigender.

Anxiegender – A gender affected by anxiety.

Cadensgender – A gender that is easily influenced by music.

Cassflux – When your level of indifference towards your gender
fluctuates.

Daimogender – A gender closely related to demons and the supernatural.

Expecgender – A gender that changes depending on who you are around.

Faegender – A gender that changes with the seasons, equinoxes and moon
phases.

Fissgender – A gender experience that is in some way split, similar to
bigender or demigenders.

Genderale – A gender that is hard to describe. Mainly associated with
plants, herbs and liquids.

Kingender – A gender somehow related to being otherkin.

Levigender – A lightweight, superficial gender you don’t feel very much.

Necrogender – A gender that used to exist but is now ‘dead’ or
nonexistent.

Omnigay – Genderfluid, with one’s attraction to other genders changing
with one’s gender, so that the individual is always attracted to the
same gender.

Perigender – Identifying with a gender, but not as that gender.

Polygenderflux – Having more than one gender, which intensity
fluctuates.

Technogender – Only comfortable with one’s gender when using
technology/online, usually because of social anxiety (specialized for
people with anxiety disorders).

Xoy – Someone who identifies in some way as a nonbinary boy or nonbinary
boy-adjacent.

Xirl – Someone who identifies in some way as a nonbinary girl or
nonbinary girl-adjacent.

These gender orientations on Tumblr are closely related to, and often
make direct reference to, another online subculture of identity fluidity
known as otherkin. This is a subculture of people who identify,
according to the Wikipedia definition, as ‘partially or entirely
non-human’ as mythical creatures, creatures from fantasy or popular
culture including ‘angels, demons, dragons, elves, fairies, sprites,
aliens and cartoon characters’. Some claim to be able to ‘astrally
shapeshift’, meaning that they experience the sense of being one of
these creatures while not actually changing physically. Of course, as
with all online culture, many Tumblr users use references to otherkin in
a self-aware manner, almost as more of a knowing self-referential
performance of belonging to a geeky subculture, but it does tell us
something, as an extreme example, of the broader theme of identity
fluidity that seems to run through it.

While gender non-conformism is nothing new, and has certainly been ever
more mainstream since the beginning of the sexual revolution and the gay
liberation movement, this is part of the creation of an online
quasi-political culture that has had a huge and unexpected level of
influence. Other similar niche online subcultures in this milieu, which
were always given by the emerging online right as evidence of Western
decline, also include adults who identify as babies and able-bodied
people who identify as disabled people to such an extent that they seek
medical assistance in blinding, amputating or otherwise injuring
themselves to become the disabled person they identify as. You may
question the motivations of the right’s fixation on these relatively
niche subcultures, but the liberal fixation on relatively niche sections
of the new online right that emerged from small online subcultures is
similar in scale – that is, the influence of Tumblr on shaping strange
new political sensibilities is probably equally important to what
emerged from rightist chan culture.

Professor Adolph Reed Jr. has often said liberals don’t believe in
actual politics anymore, just ‘bearing witness to suffering’. The cult
of suffering, weakness and vulnerability has become central to
contemporary liberal identity politics, as it is enacted in spaces like
Tumblr. It is also common in communities with a strong focus on gender
fluidity to openly identify themselves as having disabilities and mental
health issues that make them, by their own admission, extremely
vulnerable and suffering. Some of the disabilities they describe can
often be either psychological in origin or are unrecognized by modern
medicine. One example of this is found in the ‘spoonies’ identity – an
identification and online subculture in which members, typically young
women, get spoon jewelry, spoon tattoos and put ‘spoonie’ in their
social media biographies to signal their belonging.

‘Spoonies’ became known as such because of ‘spoon theory’. The term was
coined by Christine Miserandino in 2003 in her essay ‘The Spoon Theory’
(actually a metaphor), which was posted on her blog
ButYouDon’tLookSick.com. She recalls a conversation in which a friend
asked her what it was like to have an illness with no outwardly visible
symptoms. Miserandino grabbed a handful of spoons from the table and and
took them away one by one. Every spoon she then took away represented an
event or activity of a typical day, demonstrating that her energy was
very limited and, like everyone else’s, finite. While caring about
disabilities is something humans have been doing for centuries, and it’s
certainly uncontroversial, the online spoonie phenomenon became a
subculture with a certain quasi-political zeal that seemed to
characterize all the subcultures in the Tumblr identity-politics milieu.
Young women, very often also identifying as intersectional feminists and
radicals, displayed their spoonie identity and lashed out at anyone for
not reacting appropriately to their under-recognized, undiagnosed or
undiagnosable invisible illnesses or for lacking sensitivity to their
other identities.

Self-flagellation also became a core characteristic of the new identity
politics, especially among white, male, heterosexual, cis or able-bodied
members of the subcultures, who were happy to ‘check their privilege’ –
a phrase that became so central to Tumblr-liberal culture that is was
often parodied by the right. As this privilege-checking culture made its
way into mainstream discourse, anti-gamergate columnist Arthur Chu
tweeted: ‘As a dude who cares about feminism sometimes I want to join
all men arm-in-arm & then run off a cliff and drag the whole gender into
the sea.’ On the morning following the election of Donald Trump,
columnist Laurie Penny tweeted: ‘I’ve had white liberal guilt before.
Today is the first time I’ve actually been truly horrified and ashamed
to be white.’

And yet, amid all the vulnerability and self-humbling, members of these
subcultures often behaved with extraordinary viciousness and aggression,
like their anonymous Pepe-posting counterparts, behind the safety of the
keyboard. Jonathan Haidt’s famous Atlantic essay in response to the
mainstreaming of this sensibility on college campuses in the years that
followed ‘The Coddling of the American Mind’ brought a discussion of
‘generation snowflake’ into mainstream discourse. But long before that
obscure Internet spaces, subcultures and identifications fostered a
culture of fragility and victimhood mixed with a vicious culture of
group attacks, group shaming, and attempts to destroy the reputations
and lives of others within their political milieu, later dubbed
‘cry-bullying’.

While the right was developing its own critique of this strange world of
online identity politics, an explosive essay by Marxist critic Mark
Fisher appeared, called ‘Exiting the Vampire Castle’. This inflamed the
Tumblr-liberals and identitarian privilege-checking left further, and
developed out into such vicious fights, call-outs and mass shamings, it
ended up marking a split in left sensibilities for a younger generation
that would grow in the years that followed between materialists of an
older left style and those who adhere to this brand of pure identity
politics. Fisher wrote:

‘Left-wing’ Twitter can often be a miserable, dispiriting zone. Earlier
this year, there were some high-profile twitterstorms, in which
particular left-identifying figures were ‘called out’ and condemned.
What these figures had said was sometimes objectionable; but
nevertheless, the way in which they were personally vilified and hounded
left a horrible residue: the stench of bad conscience and witch-hunting
moralism. The reason I didn’t speak out on any of these incidents, I’m
ashamed to say, was fear. The bullies were in another part of the
playground. I didn’t want to attract their attention to me.

And attract their attention he did. The deluge of personal and
vindictive mass abuse experienced by Fisher for years afterwards,
involving baseless accusations of misogyny, racism, transphobia, etc.,
became typical for anyone who dared to touch on any of the Tumblr left’s
key sensitivities, perhaps especially from a left perspective. The
strangest feature of this online ‘call-out culture’ was this mixture of
performative vulnerability, self-righteous wokeness and bullying. The
online dynamics of this call-out culture were brilliantly described by
Fisher as, ‘driven by a priest’s desire to excommunicate and condemn, an
academic-pedant’s desire to be the first to be seen to spot a mistake,
and a hipster’s desire to be one of the in-crowd.’ I would add to this
that the key driving force behind it is about creating scarcity in an
environment in which virtue is the currency that can make or break the
career or social success of an online user in this milieu, the
counterforce of which was the anonymous underworld from which the
right-wing trolling cultures emerged.

To give one of countless examples of this simultaneous victimhood and
callousness, in 2016 it was reported in the news that an alligator
snatched a 2-year-old boy at a Disney resort in Florida and dragged him
into a lagoon. Despite the father’s efforts to rescue him, the boy died
– a devastatingly sad story to any normal mainstream audience. A Twitter
user known on Twitter as ‘Brienne of Snarth’ with more than 11,000
followers and an influential Tumblr page criticized the grieving father
of the toddler for his ‘white privilege’. Evidence of her online life
conformed to all the hallmarks of the Tumblr style of identity politics
and like many of the loudest callers out of white privilege turned out
to be white herself. She wrote: ‘I’m so finished with this white
privilege lately that I’m not even sad about a 2yo being eaten by a
gator because his daddy ignored signs’ and ‘You really think there are
no fucking consequences to anything. A goddam sign told you to stay out
of the water in Florida. FUCK A SIGN.’ Mainstream audiences were
outraged when the consequent Twitter storm was reported, and the
alt-right and alt-light were sharing it as evidence of the modern left’s
degeneracy, while in response many online Tumblr-liberals leaped to her
defense.

In the early days of Twitter, a platform in which users are supposed to
compete for followers and through which lagging careers can be instantly
boosted through the correct virtue signaling, minor celebrities realized
that one could attract a following greater than through traditional
media. At first, self-righteously or snarkily denouncing others for
racism, sexism or homophobia was the most instantaneous and certain way
to achieve social media fame. Something about public social media
platforms, it turned out, was conducive to the vanity of morally
righteous politics and the irresistible draw of the culture wars. But
soon the secret was out and everyone was doing it. The value of the
currency of virtue that those who had made their social media cultural
capital on was in danger of being suddenly devalued. As a result, I
believe, a culture of purging had to take place, largely targeting those
in competition for this precious currency. Thus, the attacks
increasingly focused on other liberals and leftists often with seemingly
pristine progressive credentials, instead of those who engaged in any
actual racism, sexism or homophobia.

After the Orlando shooting, in which a man who pledged allegiance to Al
Baghdadi had opened fire on a gay nightclub, millions rushed to Twitter,
to publicly share their sadness and despair. In this moment of mass
expression of pro-gay sentiment, this scarcity-creating purging process
went into overdrive, to ensure that virtue could not be spread too
thinly. One Twitter-famous intersectionalist admonished those who had
called it the worst mass shooting in US history by reminding them that
‘the worst was wounded knee’. Other similar tweeters raged against the
use of the term Latina/o instead of Latinx in the reporting, while still
others made sure to clarify that it was the shooter’s mental illness,
not his allegiance to ISIS and the caliphate, that caused the shooting.
Not to be outdone, others then tweeted back angrily about the ableism of
those who said the shooter had a mental illness. At one vigil to the
atrocity where hundreds showed up, a young woman lashed out at the
crowd: ‘There are so many white people here. That wasn’t a joke… Who are
you really here for?’

These dynamics, which began in subcultural obscurity online, later
spilled over into the campus wars over free speech, trigger warnings,
the Western canon and safe spaces. Trigger warnings had to be issued in
order to avoid the unexpectedly high number of young women who had never
gone to war claiming to have post-traumatic stress disorder. They
claimed to be ‘triggered’ by mention of anything distressing, a claim
with no scientific basis and including everything from great works of
classical literature to expressions of pretty mainstream non-liberal
opinion, like the idea that there are only two genders.

At the height of all this Germaine Greer was announced to speak at
Cardiff University about ‘Women & Power: The Lessons of the 20th
Century’. The women’s officer at Cardiff University Students’ Union,
Rachael Melhuish, decided that Greer’s presence would be ‘harmful’. In
her petition calling for the event’s cancellation, she claimed:

Greer has demonstrated time and time again her misogynistic views
towards trans women, including continually misgendering trans women and
denying the existence of transphobia altogether… Universities should
prioritise the voices of the most vulnerable on their campuses, not
invite speakers who seek to further marginalise them. We urge Cardiff
University to cancel this event.

The petition was signed by over 2,000 people and Greer was transformed
overnight from a leading veteran figure who worked for her entire life
for the cause of women’s liberation to a forbidden and toxic TERF
(Trans-Exclusionary Radical Feminist), whose name was dragged through
the dirt. As far as this new generation of campus feminists was
concerned, Greer may as well have been on the far right. Greer had not
published any comment about transgenderism for over 15 years, which was
‘not my issue’, she later told _Newsnight_. In response to the
controversy, Cardiff University’s vice-chancellor pandered to those
attacking Greer, saying: ‘discriminatory comments of any kind’ and how
it ‘work(s) hard to provide a positive and welcoming space for LGBT+
people’.

Not satisfied with the attacks on Greer thus far, online activist Payton
Quinn, identifying as ‘non binary’ and a ‘trans feminist activist and
all round ethereal being’ penned an angry public letter suggesting
Greer’s actions were criminal in an article titled ‘Entitled to Free
Speech But Not Above the Law’.

In another previously unthinkable depth for the pro-censorship left to
plumb, Peter Tatchell, life-long veteran gay activist who risked his
life many times for the cause of gay rights around the world, found
himself at the center of the next round of attacks. Fran Cowling, the
student union’s LGBTQI+ representative, said that she would not share a
stage with a man whom she regarded as having been racist, Islamophobic
and even ‘transphobic’. Cowling refused an invitation to speak if
Tatchell attended. In the emails she cited Tatchell’s signing of an open
letter in _The Observer_ the previous year in support of free speech and
against campus no-platforming. When the debacle gathered public
attention afterwards, those on the anti-Tatchell side doubled down,
arguing that the resulting negative attention they got amounted to harm
and that he was being supported by the right-wing press in his
free-speech position, with some even arguing he stage-managed the
attacks against him.

In 2015, Iranian socialist and feminist Maryam Namazie was invited to
speak at Goldsmiths University, London. Because of her militant
secularism and open apostasy as an ex-Muslim, a style that makes Western
leftists uncomfortable, controversy followed. The Islamic Society
objected to her presence on campus and when she spoke anyway, a gang of
men from the society sat in the front row of her talk trying to
intimidate her. They shouted over her, squared up to her, turned off her
projector, turned off the lights and for much of the talk she had to
shout in order to be heard over them. Video evidence of the talk shows a
level of intimidation that would be unthinkable if Namazie or her
Islamist intimidators were white and western, and yet she not only
didn’t receive solidarity from her Western comrades, but she was also
further condemned and attacked by them over the incident.

Goldsmiths Feminist Society came out in support of the Islamic Society
against Namazie, and Goldsmiths LGBT Society released a statement in
support of them also. To put in context those who the liberal students
were defending at the expense of Namazie, the President of Goldsmiths
Islamic Society, Muhammed Patel, was a supporter of hate-preacher
Haitham al-Haddad, who in an article titled ‘Standing up against
Homosexuality and LGBTs’ wrote, ‘In order to combat the scourge of
homosexuality Allah has ordained us to speak out, and that we should
co-operate with others in righteousness and God-consciousness.’

Along with this series of attacks against these and other veteran
figures of the new left, some on the right began to embrace being the
target of such campaigns – a style Milo perfected. A noted difference,
however, is that the right came out all guns blazing, while the left
response was often to be baffled, cowed or apologetic and in some cases
to retreat from the left itself. I often think the brain drain out of
the left during this period because of the Tumblrization of left
politics has done damage that will prove long-lasting.

In Canada Dr. Jordan Peterson became a hero of the alt-light after he
refused to agree to legislation formalizing the use of alternative
pronouns in his university, like ‘ze’ or ‘zir’ as alternatives to the
old hat ‘she’ or ‘he’. At an event to protest him, he appeared to speak
to those who had gathered, and was drowned out by a white noise machine
and was yelled at by members of the crowd. He also says the lock on his
office door was glued shut, and his institution offered platitudinous
support for his right to academic freedom and free speech, but warned he
could get in legal trouble with the Ontario Human Rights code. The
university received a wave of complaints from students and faculty that
his criticisms of the new rules on pronouns were ‘unacceptable,
emotionally disturbing and painful’.

In March 2015, Laura Kipnis wrote an essay in _The Chronicle of Higher
Education_, in which she criticized the atmosphere of ‘sexual paranoia’
on campuses, defended professor-student sexual relationships and
criticized trigger warnings. A group of students protested in response,
demanding that the administration reaffirm its commitment to the
policies that Kipnis criticized. They carried a mattress—a reference to
Emma Sulkowicz’s earlier protest at Columbia University against rape on
campus. Invoking university legislation, two grad students filed
complaints against Kipnis, arguing that her article, which she has since
expanded into a book, would deter students from reporting sexual
misconduct. Kipnis publicly fought the attacks against her and was
eventually exonerated.

These are just a few select cases in what felt like an endless stream of
campus culture wars over these sexuality/gender/ identity issues that
emerged after years of a particular kind of identity politics being
nurtured online. But how do these compare with past campus wars? William
F. Buckley founded _National Review_ as a ‘counterestablishment’ to the
academic one and famously said: ‘I’d rather entrust the government of
the United States to the first 400 people listed in the Boston telephone
directory than to the faculty of Harvard University.’ In 1983 Robert
Simonds, a spokesperson for the National Association of Christian
Educators, said that a ‘great war’ was happening over education.
Political commentator Walter Lippmann wrote: ‘It is in the school that
the child is drawn towards or drawn away from the religion and the
patriotism of his parents.’ And they were right to notice the ‘long
march through the institutions’ that was taking place. Teachers in
training were assigned books like Friere’s _Pedagogy of the Oppressed_
and major culture-wars battles were waged over creeping feminism and
multiculturalism in education and in the broader culture. Phyllis
Schlafly’s book _Child Abuse in the Classroom_ on the same topic had a
big influence on conservative mistrust of the liberal indoctrination at
work in public schools.

At colleges and universities, debates about whether Stanford University
should assign John Locke or Frantz Fanon played out, writes Hartman, and
from the _Wall Street Journal_ to books like _The Closing of the
American Mind_ by Allan Bloom, _Illiberal Education_ by Dinesh D’Souza
and _Tenured Radicals: How Politics Has Corrupted Our Higher Education_
by Roger Kimball. Today, these same debates are playing out on college
campuses with the ‘decolonize our minds’ movement and the campaign
around ‘Rhodes Must Fall’ the successful attempt to pressure Cape Town
University to have a statue of Cecil Rhodes removed. Members of the
campaign later commented after they achieved their goal, ‘the fall of
“Rhodes” is symbolic for the inevitable fall of white supremacy and
privilege at our campus.’

In 1988, students held a rally, chanting ‘hey hey ho ho Western
culture’s got to go’ over Standford’s Western Civilization program,
which sparked a huge culture war over the issue of a Western-centric
canon. The pressure of the campaign resulted in the university’s
decision to modify the curriculum. Central to the undermining of the
Western canon was the relativism of figures like literary theorist
Stanley Fish, who undermined the idea of the stable meaning of texts and
of a literary canon having objective timeless value: ‘The only way we
can hope to interpret a literary work is by knowing the vantage point
from which we perform the act of interpretation.’ Filled with
like-minded academics, Duke University’s English department became known
as ‘the Fish tank’, that also promoted French theory in which universal
claims about truth were represented as serving the interests of the
powerful.

Camille Paglia later wrote: ‘French theory is like those how-to tapes
that guaranteed to make you a real estate millionaire overnight. Gain
power by attacking power! Call this number in Paris now!’ Bloom, also
Paglia’s Ph.D. supervisor, supported the idea of aesthetic and taste
discrimination in the service of truth and beauty, and believed
relativistic thinking was a slippery slope to nihilism. He wrote:
‘Stanford students are to be indoctrinated with ephemeral ideologies and
taught that there can be no intellectual resistance to one’s own time
and its passions’… ‘This total surrender to the present and abandonment
of the quest for standards with which to judge it are the very
definition of the closing of the American mind and I could not hope for
more stunning confirmation of my thesis.’ This critique of liberal
presentism has since been neatly summed up in the alt-right’s use of the
expression ‘the current year’ – a mocking way to describe the liberal
insistence that ‘you can’t still hold that opinion, it’s 2017!’

Todd Gitlin, a key figure in the Berkeley New Left movement, emerged as
an internal critic of the left over that round of campus wars, arguing
that the left ‘marched on the English department while the right took
the White House.’ He believed that demands for equality should be
grounded in universalism and believed academic relativistic notions of
identity, which have today reached their logical conclusion in the
Tumblr world of proliferating identities, represented the ‘twilight of
equality’. Also in parallel with the fallout from the online culture
wars and contemporary campus and identity wars, Gitlin’s critique of
identity politics emerged when SDS was destroyed through internal
divisions over universal goals and identity politics. He argued that the
relativism of radicals would bring about the ‘twilight of common dreams’
arguing that: ‘The cant of identity underlies identity politics which
proposes to deduce a position, a tradition, a deep truth, or a way of
life from a fact of birth, physiognomy, national origin, sex or physical
disability.’ In what could have come straight out of the mouth of Jordan
Peterson or many others to his right today, Gitlin said ‘a bitter
intolerance emanates from much of the academic left.’

In 1996, a famous hoax that still haunts academe was perpetrated by Alan
Sokal, a physics professor at New York University and University College
London. He submitted an article to _Social Text_, an academic journal of
postmodern cultural studies, whose editorial collective included stars
at the time like Fredric Jameson and Andrew Ross, called ‘Transgressing
the Boundaries: Towards a Transformative Hermeneutics of Quantum
Gravity’. It was intentionally ‘liberally salted with nonsense’ and
proposed that gravity was a social construct. Sokal then revealed that
the article was ‘a pastiche of left-wing cant, fawning references,
grandiose quotations, and outright nonsense.’

Today, this struggle over campuses continues, from Milo’s tour to the
Twitter account Real Peer Review, which publishes the titles and
abstracts, sometimes with funny quotes, of absurd academic papers
typically from cultural studies or theory-based journals, on everything
from feminist analysis of glaciers to fat masculinities. Interestingly
also to the contemporary context, after the Sokal affair an academic
conference was called, with Judith Butler as a leading speaker, to deal
with the emergence of something dubbed ‘left conservatism’. This
included figures like Sokal, who identified as on the left, and his
left-wing supporters, including Barbara Ehrenreich, an idiosyncratic and
independent-minded leftist who has always tended to write accessibly
about issues of poverty and working-class life in books like _Nickle and
Dimed_. The term ‘conservative’ here was of course meant pejoratively to
expel certain people and thoughts

– and those that might have been privately sympathetic to them

– from respectable academic discourse.

Today, we are still having much the same culture war. If one had to pick
a single thinker whose ideas have most shaped the Tumblr left, it would
undoubtedly be Judith Butler and those on the left who remain critics of
that identity-oriented cultural left are still the kind of people who
would align more closely with Gitlin and Ehrenreich. Paglia is now
regarded as ‘based goddess’ by the alt-light and her work has been
brought to a younger generation through Christina Hoff Sommers. The
genuinely conservative right of Schlafly, meanwhile, is the only force
described here that really has died, as the new right is as
transgressive and rule-breaking as the new left once was. And yet on
some of these issues like opposition to feminism, the canon, Cultural
Marxism, the West and so on, the alt-right do carry their torch.



CHAPTER SIX



ENTERING THE MANOSPHERE


While feminism has expanded and thrived online in recent years so, too,
has anti-feminist masculinist politics, which again developed in the
context of evermore radical liberal gender politics and increasingly
common anti-male rhetoric that went from obscure feminist online spaces
to the mainstream. The ‘red pill’ metaphor that has been central to
alt-right rhetoric has also been central to these anti-feminist
masculinist political subcultures that constantly cross-pollinate with
different layers of the online right. The many sites, subcultures and
identifications associated with this anti-feminist online movement have
grown and multiplied, to an extent that would undoubtedly have been
written up as a ‘digital revolution’ if it had different cultural
politics. These subcultures, between which there is often animosity, and
some important political and philosophical difference, have become
collectively referred to by some observers as ‘the Manosphere’. The term
has been used to describe everything from progressive men’s issues
activists dealing with real neglect of male health, suicide and unequal
social services to the nastier corners of the Internet, filled with
involuntary celibacy-obsessed, hate-filled, resentment-fueled cultures
of quite chilling levels of misogyny.

Before delving into yet another aspect of the culture wars that
typically generates all heat and no light, I’m not at all unsympathetic
to the genuinely egalitarian goals of fairness also found in the men’s
rights movement. Fair and equal treatment in the courts should be a
right to all people and the creeping underachievement of boys at school,
the high suicide rates and the general culture of speaking about men
with contempt all deserve criticism and need to be reformed. They are
correct to argue that many feminists, a movement to which I belong, have
often been intolerant and dogmatic on these issues. And yet, observing
these online spaces, it is simply impossible to deny the rampant hateful
misogyny, bitterness, conspiratorial thinking and generally foul
character that seems to run through them. So it is worth saying first
that my descriptions here are, like my descriptions of the worst of
Tumblr-liberalism, 4chan and others, not representative of what you
might call ‘the men’s movement’ in general but of the darker online
underbelly that has flourished online.

This crop of forum dwelling-obsessives would be horrified to learn that
the original men’s movement grew out of and alongside the feminist
movement and the sexual liberation movement as a critique of rigid
traditional sex roles, according to masculinities scholar Michael
Kimmel. Men’s liberation later grew apart from the feminist movement as
second-wave feminism became increasingly antagonistic towards men,
criticizing men as a whole in its rhetoric around rape and domestic
violence. Splits and tendencies developed as the question of men’s
experience of their societal role took different thinkers and factions
in radically different directions. It was by the 90s that the men’s
movement became primarily focused on institutions in which men were
excluded or discriminated against.

Different types of men’s movements existed across this trajectory. In
the UK there were progressive groups like Men Against Sexism and the New
Men’s Movement, which would both be labelled ‘manginas’ by today’s
charming brand of alt-right tinged online anti-feminists. Under the
banner of the ‘men’s movement’ in the US there have been groups with
diverse orientations from Christian men’s groups like the Promise
Keepers to the mythopoetic movement of the poet Robert Bly, which
searched for a male authenticity lost by life in a modern, feminized,
atomized society. It was in the 90s, during what journalist Susan Faludi
described as a ‘backlash’ against second-wave feminism, in the US in
particular, that the formulation of the men’s movement that we associate
with the term today gained prominence, which necessitated a certain
antagonism toward feminism.

The critique of the restrictive traditional male sex role gave way to a
celebration of masculinity itself, while feminism became the political
enemy force. This wave of more overtly anti-feminist men’s politics
included the National Coalition of Free Men, who took influence from
books like Warren Farrell’s _The Myth of Male Power_ and Neil Lyndon’s
_No More Sex War: The Failures of Feminism_. They rejected the idea of
male privilege and focused on discrimination against fathers and
violence against men. But even the most militantly anti-feminist forms
of pre-Internet men’s rights activism now seem supremely reasonable and
mild compared with the anti-feminism that emerged online in the 2010s. A
more openly hateful culture was unleashed under the conditions of
anonymity and it took on a more right-wing character, living up to the
most negative feminist caricatures of men’s rights activism –
rage-filled, hateful and chauvinistic.

The Reddit subforum The Red Pill has been central to the online
development and resurgence of this anti-feminist politics online. At the
same time as these anti-feminists were using the term to describe their
awakening from the blissful mind prison of liberalism into the unplugged
reality of societal misandry, the hard alt-right was embracing the term
to describe their equivalent racial awakening. On AlternativeRight.com
‘the red pill’ and ‘being red pilled’ was one of the central metaphors
and favorite expressions. On Reddit’s Red Pill forum, men discussed
false rape accusations, female-on-male violence, cultural misandry,
avoidance of ‘pedestalling pussy’ and ‘game’ – meaning a style of ‘pick
up artist’ dating advice that began with Neil Strauss’s 2005 book _The
Game_. Looking back today, Strauss’s book seems pretty mild and
inoffensive, certainly compared to today’s online pickup artistry
forums, which tend to read like a sinister Darwinian guide to tricking
the loathed female prey into surrender. Discussions on these issues on
various Reddit forums and other forums within the anti-feminist
manosphere are a pretty relentless flow of sexual frustration, anxiety
about evolutionary rank and foaming-at-the-mouth misogyny full of
descriptions of women as ‘worthless cunts’, ‘attention whores’, ‘riding
the cock carousel’, and so on.

One of the dominant and consistent preoccupations running through the
forum culture of the manosphere is the idea of beta and alpha males.
They discuss how women prefer alpha males and either cynically use or
completely ignore beta males, by which they mean low-ranking males in
the stark and vicious social hierarchy through which they interpret all
human interaction. Some follow the pickup artistry of bloggers like
Roosh V in order to rise from a ‘nice guy’ beta to a sexually successful
alpha. Roosh (aka Daryush Valizadeh) began as a pickup artist, later
self-described as a neo-masculinist and flirted with the hard alt-right,
who he would have found common ground with in their shared belief that
feminism is a major cause of civilizational decline. He positively
reviewed alt-right writer Kevin MacDonald’s _The Culture of Critiques_
and titled it, ‘The Damaging Effects Of Jewish Intellectualism And
Activism On Western Culture’.

He became known first, however, for a series of books called Bang, which
advocate the aforementioned style of aggressive, manipulative,
social-Darwinist-tinged approach to coaxing women to have sex, in which
he travels to different countries taking notes on strategy and then
advises his followers. Always the romantic, he used the ebooks and blogs
to detail the ‘ruthlessly optimized process’ that ‘enabled me to put my
penis inside’ various women. His website, called Return of Kings, is one
of the more notorious of the misogynist sites in the manosphere.

Roosh V doesn’t identify with equality-based men’s rights activism or
the MGTOW movement, calling them ‘sexual losers’and ‘bitter virgins’.
Return of Kings has included titles such as ‘Biology Says People on
Welfare Should Die’, ‘Don’t Work for a Female Boss’ and ‘5 Reasons to
Date a Girl With an Eating Disorder’. He has said he would not perform
oral sex on a woman for quasi-political reasons. He complained about
women in Denmark, and claimed that because of the strong welfare state
and feminist culture, he didn’t have much sexual success with them on
his Bang tour. Interviewed from a mystery location in Eastern Europe, he
said he preferred it there because the women were more ‘traditional’.

He also saw Trump’s win as a victory for his movement, saying: ‘I’m in a
state of exuberance that we now have a President who rates women on a
1–10 scale in the same way that we do and evaluates women by their
appearance and feminine attitude,’ adding ‘We may have to institute a
new feature called “Would Trump bang?” to signify the importance of
feminine beauty ideals that cultivate effort and class above sloth and
vulgarity.’

Roosh V attracted attention internationally for a blog post that he
wrote titled ‘How to Stop Rape’ in which he said:

If rape becomes legal under my proposal, a girl will protect her body in
the same manner that she protects her purse and smartphone. If rape
becomes legal, a girl will not enter an impaired state of mind where she
can’t resist being dragged off to a bedroom with a man who she is unsure
of—she’ll scream, yell, or kick at his attempt while bystanders are
still around. If rape becomes legal, she will never be unchaperoned with
a man she doesn’t want to sleep with. After several months of
advertising this law throughout the land, rape would be virtually
eliminated on the first day it is applied.

He claims that the piece was ‘satire’. How it would work as satire
remains unclear, but it is not altogether implausible that it was some
kind of attempt at a satirical or knowing tone that just didn’t quite
work. It didn’t work primarily because his own views are too close to
those being described satirically, so there is no level of knowing
absurdity to them. A typical example of his style would be quotes like:
‘My default opinion of any girl I meet is worthless dirty whore until
proven otherwise.’ Let’s just say it was not quite Swift. As a result of
the piece, a petition was launched on Change.org that called for Roosh V
to be banned from Canada, which gathered over 38,000 signatures.

Closer to an older style of men’s rights politics, as distinct from the
PUA or cultural politics of Reddit, the website A Voice for Men is
perhaps the most important men’s rights movement website around right
now, and it was founded and run by Paul Elam. To give a sense of the
tone of the site, on the main page at the time of writing they’re
advertising two books. The first is called _Memoirs of a Misogynist: An
Erotic Novel for Men_, and the second is called _The Seduction of Anita
Sarkeesian_ and features a scraggily drawn cartoon of Anita with her
hand down her pants on the cover accompanied with the description if you
hate Anita, then why not irritate her by purchasing a copy?’ Featured
articles include ‘13 reasons women lie about rape’ and ‘All women are
pedophiles and that’s all they are’ – a reference to Marilyn French’s
‘All men are rapists and that’s all they are’ from 1978. The site often
reads like a catalog of the very worst rhetorical excesses in the
history of feminism but with the sexes reversed.

In 2011, Elam established the vigilante doxxing site Register-Her.com,
which publishes the personal information of women the site claims ‘have
caused significant harm to innocent individuals either by the direct
action of crimes like rape, assault, child molestation and murder, or by
the false accusation of crimes against others.’ This vigilante strategy
became widespread on both sides of the culture wars and will always
entail serious real-world consequences like harassment and stalking, the
loss of reputation, work and relationships. While the list included
women who have been sent to prison for various crimes, it also included
others who were acquitted and listed female rape victims whose court
cases didn’t result in a full conviction as a ‘false accuser’.

In an unflattering Buzzfeed profile, Elam’s ex-wife and daughter say he
abandoned his wife and children twice, from two separate families, and
they say he has only been able to make A Voice for Men his full-time job
because of the women who have financially supported him throughout his
life. He has compared the family court system’s treatment of fathers to
Jim Crow saying ‘fathers are forced to pay child support like it was
mafia protection money’, and accused his first wife of lying about rape
in order to relinquish his own parental rights to avoid paying child
support, according to the profile. Despite having had a violent and
abusive father, Elam claims he realized at a young age that it was a
‘woman’s world’.

He used to blog under the name ‘The Happy Misogynist’. In 2011, feminist
writer Jessica Valenti’s personal information was added to Register Her
and Elam said on radio, ‘We’re gonna be all over her like Ron Jeremy on
a drug-addled bimbo.’ Valenti claims she was so overwhelmed with
threatening abuse that she contacted the FBI and left her house until
things died down. In one post, he wrote:

All the PC demands to get huffy and point out how nothing justifies or
excuses rape won’t change the fact that there are a lot of women who get
pummeled and pumped because they are stupid (and often arrogant) enough
to walk [through] life with the equivalent of a I’M A STUPID, CONNIVING
BITCH – PLEASE RAPE ME neon sign glowing above their empty little
narcissistic heads.

To an outsider there may seem to be total coherence within the
anti-feminist Internet, but it is actually wracked with as much
infighting as you find among any political subculture. A few important
sites in the manosphere throughout the online culture wars, some now
defunct or banned, included Reddit’s PhilosophyOfRape, in which you
could find topics like the promotion of ‘corrective rape’ against
feminists, The Counter-Feminist, Love-shy.com, /r/mensrights, The
Anti-Feminist, SlutHate.com and /r/incel for the involuntarily celibate
beta male. Advice seeking in anti-feminist and pickup artist (PUA)
forums often comes from self-identifying ‘nice guys’, whose commentary
on women suggests their sense of self may be a little lacking in honest
reflection. There are also PUA-hate forums, for those who are critical
of pickup artistry as a scam that places too much of the responsibility
on men to change their own behavior through bodybuilding and learning
‘game’ just to impress ‘stupid sluts’, by which they simultaneously
always seem to mean women who they’re angry at because they _won’t_ put
out.

In the more explicitly alt-right crossover sites, as the anti-feminist
sphere and the race-oriented sphere started to meet, Chateau Heartiste
is an MRA and PUA blog run by James C. Weidmann (aka ‘Roissy in DC’),
which mixes evolutionary psychology, anti-feminism and white advocacy.
In the blog he argues that women’s economic freedom is leading to
civilizational collapse. He believes white civilization is being
destroyed by miscegenation, immigration and low white female birth rates
owing to feminism. This decline can only be undone, he thinks, by
deporting minorities and restoring patriarchy.

Anti-feminist blogger Vox Day identifies with the alt-right and was an
early supporter of gamergate. He is also the author of _SJWs Always Lie:
Taking Down the Thought Police_. Like all of the anti-feminist
alt-right, he also believes that feminism in the West is a
civilizational threat. He opposes the concept rape within marriage, for
example, saying: ‘The concept of marital rape is not merely an oxymoron,
it is an attack on the institution of marriage, on the concept of
objective law, and indeed, on the core foundation of human civilization
itself.’ Jack Donovan is another significant MRA alt-right crossover, as
a self-proclaimed ‘androphile’ who has written for AlternativeRight.com.

The Men Going Their Own Way (MGTOW) movement is a straight male
separatist group whose members have chosen (ahem) to avoid romantic
relationships with women in protest against a culture destroyed by
feminism, and to focus instead on individual achievement and
independence from women. The rhetoric suggests punishment and revenge
are at the heart of their motivations, as their advice is usually
peppered with references to a ‘bitch’ who will cheat, leave, use you for
your money and so on. They like to discuss women ‘riding the cock
carousel’ throughout their twenties, and then entering their thirties
and finding that their ‘stocks’ on the dating scene have started to
fall. Like the alt-right they believe feminism has destroyed Western
civilization, etc., etc., and that women will either trick them into
raising children that aren’t theirs, get pregnant intentionally in order
to trap them, or falsely accuse them of rape.

In just about any YouTube video that touches on men’s issues you’ll find
MGTOW adherents in the comment thread depicting women as worthless and
mindlessly led by biological impulses, and saying that marriage should
be boycotted. There are four levels of MGTOW, and adherents often signal
their stages of progression and the amount of time they’ve _‘been
mig-tow’_. Level 0 is where the member ‘takes the red pill’ and rejects
feminism. At level 1 MGTOWs reject long-term relationships, at level 2
they reject short-term relationships and hook-ups, level 3 requires
economic disengagement from women and level 4 is societal disengagement,
where the man refuses to interact with an entire society poisoned by
feminism. In their forums they discuss one-night stands, while others
rely solely on masturbation or prostitution, depending on their level.

An article by Milo in _Breitbart_ on ‘the Sexodus’ helped make MGTOW
famous. In it, he wrote encouragingly about men’s flight from women,
romance, sex and marriage as a consequence of pervasive feminism –
something he seems to change his mind about, sometimes arguing feminism
is ubiquitous, sometimes arguing it’s deeply unpopular with women
because of its misandry. MGTOW are not to be conflated with other
militantly anti-feminist movements, however. An article on Return of
Kings called ‘Virgins Going Their Own Way’ described MGTOW as ‘The
creeping cult of male loserdom’, resulting in much internal squabbling
within the anti-feminist Internet. In the many YouTube videos devoted to
MGTOW, usually under a pseudonym and with no images of the speaker, a
strangely common feature is a kind of robotic voice, almost like a
newsreader, an unconvincing voice of ultra-rationality to conceal what
seems like a great deal of bitterness and hurt at rejection.

The most amusing of all these is the Proud Boys movement, who have a
kind of Fred Perry-wearing, skinhead punk aesthetic and want to spread
the ‘No Wanks’ doctrine. Its founder is Gavin McInnes and their tenets
include, according to him, ‘minimal government, maximum freedom,
anti-political correctness, anti-racial guilt, pro-gun rights, anti-Drug
War, closed borders, anti-masturbation, venerating entrepreneurs,
venerating housewives.’ McInnes has compared it to the hardcore scene in
the 80s, ‘where there wasn’t really a boss’.

The scene produces its logos, tattoos and imagery in a punk-inspired
leaderless DIY way. It also has a quasi-ironic frat-style system of
hazing and again a system of ‘levels’. First level Proud Boy simply
requires declaring yourself a Proud Boy. To ascend to a second level
Proud Boy you must adhere to ‘No Wanks’ (they use the hashtag #NoWanks),
meaning you limit pornography and masturbation to once a month, and you
also have to get a beating until you can name five breakfast cereals.
The third level involves getting a tattoo declaring your allegiance to
Proud Boys and No Wanks. Masturbation and pornography are central to the
(like _Vice_, sort of tongue-in-cheek but sort of not) Proud Boys
philosophy. McInnes has said, ‘Gen X guys, it’s making you weaker and
stupider and lazier. And millennials, well, it’s making you not even
want to pursue relationships.’ He encourages young men to instead ‘throw
down bricks’, which means to approach women in real life. The thinking
behind Proud Boys features some of the general declension narratives
shared by the alt-right and the conservative tradition, in particular
Western decline and decadence owing to the rise of liberalism and
feminism: ‘With all liberal concepts, we wiped out tradition and
replaced it with something worse.’

A frustrating contradiction and hypocrisy you find in many of these
online spaces and subcultures is that they want the benefits of
tradition without its necessary restraints and duties. They
simultaneously want the best of the sexual revolution (sexual success
with pornified women, perpetually dolled up, waxed and willing to do
anything) without the attendant insecurities of a society in which women
have sexual choice and freedom. So, for example, Roosh V complains about
the low morals of ‘sluts’, but writes an entire series called Bang about
random promiscuous sex with women, strangers he seems to actively
dislike. In the case of Proud Boys, as ridiculous as you feel even
saying the name, there is an attempt at some certain internal coherence
to its moral system. Proud Boys seeks to return to a more traditional
way of life, but it also adopts a conservative approach to pornography
and masturbation, and claims to ‘honor the housewife’. It’s still not
much of a recommendation, but perhaps it is less overtly hateful towards
women at least in principle.

And yet McInnes was the ultimate partying hipster hedonist, largely
responsible for the whole _Vice_ magazine style. His show features
female porn star guests and he rates women out of ten. This glaring
contradiction runs through all of the alt-right when it comes to women.
The most important space for the production of alt-right and alt-light
aesthetics for years has been 4chan, which is full of pornography that
is so disturbing and so intentionally dehumanizing that anyone other
than a moral and emotional derelict would be repulsed by it instead of
chuckling idiotically, as they seem to do.

Lastly, and most interestingly, F. Roger Devlin is an alt-right writer,
a white nationalist, an MRA and anti-feminist, read by MGTOW adherents
and a range of rightist anti-feminists. He is perhaps one of those who
has attempted to theorize a more serious anti-feminist politics. Devlin
is a contributing editor to _The Occidental Quarterly: Western
Perspectives on Man, Politics and Culture_ and also writes for VDARE.
His essay ‘Sexual Utopia in Power’ argues against ‘today’s sexual
dystopia, with its loose morals and confused sexual roles.’ It explores
‘female hypergamy (mating up), narcissism, infidelity, deceptiveness,
and masochism.’ It also argues that ‘the breakdown of monogamy results
in promiscuity for the few, loneliness for the majority.’

On this last point, I think he’s getting to the central issue driving
this kind of reactionary sexual politics, perhaps even the central
personal motivation behind the entire turn to the far right among young
men. The sexual revolution that started the decline of lifelong marriage
has produced great freedom from the shackles of loveless marriage and
selfless duty to the family for both men and women. But this
ever-extended adolescence has also brought with it the rise of adult
childlessness and a steep sexual hierarchy. Sexual patterns that have
emerged as a result of the decline of monogamy have seen a greater level
of sexual choice for an elite of men and a growing celibacy among a
large male population at the bottom of the pecking order. Their own
anxiety and anger about their low-ranking status in this hierarchy is
precisely what has produced their hard-line rhetoric about asserting
hierarchy in the world politically when it comes to women and
non-whites. The pain of relentless rejection has festered in these
forums and allowed them to be the masters of the cruel natural
hierarchies that bring them so much humiliation.

This psychological compensation is nothing new. Nietzsche’s fetish for
physical male strength, hierarchy and the exertion of will, which his
Nazi followers were attracted to in his writing, contrasted in a
similarly pathetic way to the reality of his physical state – myopia,
nervous prostration, chronic ill-health, digestive disorders and of
course the bitter rejection by women.

Celibate and romantically rejected young men fill spaces like Reddit’s
incel subforum for the involuntarily celibate, where they go to seek
advice and express their sexual frustration. At the time of writing, the
latest post on the /r/incel reads: ‘I spent 4 hours just staring at the
wall in my room. What normies call an existential crisis, for the incel
is simply… life.’ It has been from this celibate milieu that the racial
hierarchical politics of the alt-right has drawn, not exclusively, of
course, but its recurrence as a theme is telling. These frustrated young
men are first exposed to social-Darwinian thinking about attracting a
mate in the name of ‘game’, then to the misogynist rhetoric about
women’s evil narcissistic nature when the gaming doesn’t work. Look at
the comment section of any of the vast and ever-growing genres of
anti-feminist YouTube videos and you’ll quickly find rhetoric about
women being worthless, sluts, stupid, fat, lazy, shallow, hysterical,
untrustworthy and justly deserving of violent retribution. Because of
the level of cross-pollination between the manosphere and the alt-right,
it would be impossible at this point for them not to be exposed to those
ideas eventually. Certainly, their anger at their low-ranking position
in the sexual pecking order can occasionally burst forth in extreme
ways.

One of those who took the violent fantasies of these forums into real
life was the ‘virgin killer’ Elliot Rodger, who drove to a University of
California-Santa Barbara sorority house with a plan to massacre the
women inside. When he couldn’t gain entry to the building, Rodger shot
at random people outside, in the end killing mostly men. The rampage
ended when police found him dead in his car with a gunshot wound to the
head. Rodger had uploaded a final video to YouTube, titled ‘Elliot
Rodger’s Retribution’. In it, he described his desire to punish women
for rejecting him:

Well, this is my last video, it all has to come to this. Tomorrow is the
day of retribution, the day in which I will have my revenge against
humanity, against all of you… I’ve been through college for two and a
half years, more than that actually, and I’m still a virgin. It has been
very torturous… I don’t know why you girls aren’t attracted to me, but I
will punish you all for it… I’m the perfect guy and yet you throw
yourselves at these obnoxious men instead of me, the supreme gentleman.

The term ‘supreme gentleman’ has remained a joke on the anti-feminist
Internet ever since and Rodger has become a comical archetypal figure of
the angry beta male. Rodger also left behind a lengthy autobiographical
manuscript, titled _My Twisted World_. He described his sexual
frustration, his hatred of women who kept thwarting his desire to have
sexual relationships with them, his bitter loathing of those sexually
successful men, who he also called ‘brutes’ and ‘animals’, and his
contempt for interracial couples in which a white woman coupled off with
a man Rodger saw as genetically inferior to him. He mentions a ‘War on
Women’:

The Second Phase will take place on the Day of Retribution itself, just
before the climactic massacre. My War on Women. I will attack the very
girls who represent everything I hate in the female gender: The hottest
sorority of UCSB.

On 4chan the day the story broke, one contributor posted an image of
Rodger and wrote: ‘Elliot Rodger, the supreme gentleman, was part of
/b/. Discuss.’ Commenters replied: ‘That dude was fairly good looking.
He must’ve just been the beta to end all betas if he never got laid.’
Another wrote: ‘Manifesto had “I do not forget, I do not forgive” and
“kissless virgin”, etc., he was a /b/tard.’ Rodger’s ‘I do not forget, I
do not forgive’.

After the killing, one reporter was contacted by a fellow online
community member of PUAhate on Reddit, an incel forum used regularly by
Rodger, who explained that the community was wrongly ‘being depicted as
a place where bitter men sat around discussing their hatred of women.’
In a typical type of response one is always faced with when trying to
describe how jaw-droppingly hate-filled these spaces can be, the
journalist was assured that the forum was ‘more light-hearted than
violent’. He also noted that the forum user’s chosen pseudonym right
after the killing spree was ‘ElliotRodgerIsAGod’.



CHAPTER SEVEN



BASIC BITCHES, NORMIES AND THE LAMESTREAM


In the aftermath of Trump’s election, one of the more sympathetic types
of analysis found everywhere from _The Guardian_ to the _Financial
Times_ framed Trump’s victory as one that reflected the views of
‘ordinary people’ who felt ‘left behind’. Thomas Frank was one of the
most insistent voices from the left articulating this critique of
disdainful liberal elitism, saying:

We cannot admit that we liberals bear some of the blame for its
emergence, for the frustration of the working-class millions, for their
blighted cities and their downward spiraling lives. So much easier to
scold them for their twisted racist souls, to close our eyes to the
obvious reality of which Trumpism is just a crude and ugly expression:
that neoliberalism has well and truly failed.

Although the idea that ordinary people felt alienated by political
correctness was not uncommon in right-wing rhetoric, there was also
quite a remarkable shift from a subcultural elitism to a sudden
proletarian righteousness, or even a bit of _noblesse oblige_, as though
the right had been making Thomas Frank’s argument all along. In reality
they had been making pro-inequality, misanthropic, economically elitist
arguments for natural hierarchy all along. As I noted previously in a
2017 piece for _The Baffler_, Ann Coulter had long drawn upon the elite
fear of the hysterical and easily led crowd. In her book _Demonic: How
the Liberal Mob is Endangering America_ explaining how ‘the liberal mob
is destroying America’ she drew upon Gustave LeBon, the misanthropists’
favorite theorist of the masses. Her writing on overbreeding,
overcrowding swarms of immigrants is a direct continuation of this
theme, which has been consistent in elite circles since the beginning of
industrialized urbanized mass society, first applied to their
multiplying native proletariat and later to new waves of immigrants.

Before the ‘ordinary people’ narrative became suddenly ubiquitous on the
new online right after the election results, Milo could be seen in photo
shoots wearing a ‘Stop Being Poor’ T-shirt, a quote from the heiress
Paris Hilton, one of his idols. After the election results he was giving
talks about the white working class. The hard alt-right had also
rejected the idea that the masses were their naturally traditionalist
allies any longer, as the conservative establishment had typically
believed. Instead, they had argued that the great mass of society had
been tainted and indoctrinated by liberal feminist multiculturalism, and
were close to beyond redemption. It was no longer ‘five minutes to
midnight’ as the anti-immigration right had long claimed but well past
midnight. While the Trumpians are busy quickly rewriting history, it is
important to remember that behind the ‘populist’ president, the rhetoric
of his young online far-right vanguard had long been characterized by an
extreme subcultural snobbishness toward the masses and mass culture.

American writer David Auerbach explained that one of the defining
features of what he called A-culture, or anonymous chan culture, was
‘the constant hazing of n00bs through argot and complex conventions and
elite technical knowledge polices the boundaries of the subculture to
inoculate it from massification.’ Gabriella Coleman wrote that ‘trolling
proliferated and exploded at the moment the Internet became populated
with non-technologically-minded people’ and went on to say ‘Trolls work
to remind the masses that have lapped onto the shores of the Internet
that there is a class of geek who, as their name suggests, will cause
Internet grief, hell, misery.’ Although Coleman’s description contains
more than a hint of admiration and subtle nod of approval, to me this
goes to the very heart of how vile and misanthropic the whole culture
around the chans is and has always been, not in spite of but because of
its countercultural style and sensibility. That it eventually fused so
completely with the alt-right makes perfect sense.

Swastika-tattooed Nazi hacker and troll weev, who Coleman has always
written flatteringly about, elaborated his views on the masses in an
interview:

Trolling is basically Internet eugenics. I want everyone off the
Internet. Bloggers are filth. They need to be destroyed. Blogging gives
the illusion of participation of a bunch of retards… We need to put
these people in the oven… We are headed for a Malthusian crisis.
Plankton levels are dropping. Bees are dying. There are tortilla riots
in Mexico, the highest wheat prices in 30-odd years… The question we
have to answer is: How do we kill four of the world’s six billion people
in the most just way possible?

This misanthropy and anxiety over the breeding of lower orders is one of
the most dominant features of alt-right discourse from the foul-mouthed
chaos of chan culture to the more serious long-form theory of the
alt-right proper. But this is nothing new. Literary critic John Carey
wrote about Malthusian, eugenicist and other elite prejudices against
emerging mass society and mass culture. During the nineteenth century,
he explains, the poorer section of Europe’s population _tripled_, and
industrialization crammed more and more workers into previously elite
urban cultural spaces. H. G. Wells despaired at the ‘extravagant swarm
of new births’ and called it ‘the essential disaster of the twentieth
century’, a sentiment echoed by weev nearly a hundred years later. What
Yeats called the ‘spread of democratic vulgarity’ and mass literacy was
quickly changing the nature of the divide between the elite and the
rapidly expanding masses.

This discourse seems to be channeled today by the new online far right
but through a subcultural anti-mainstream style, which has been more
palatable to academia and to progressives because they recognize this
countercultural elitism from their own political circles. We can see
some kind of hybrid of these sensibilities in the online spaces from
which rightist trolling styles and much of the current anti-feminism is
generated – a mix of the Nietzschean misanthropic sensibility and the
more counterculture-tinged _Fight Club_ referencing one. Nietzsche, by
far the most influential thinker across all of the strands that make up
the alt-right, warned that ‘a declaration of war on the masses by higher
men is needed’ to dominate ‘the superfluous’.

Early on, the reaction of mainstream conservative media to Internet
trolls from the chan world was an unambiguously moral and condemnatory
one, and the standard progressive academic reflex (implicitly
pro-counterculture, implicitly pro-transgression) was less critical,
verging on celebratory. The Fox News depiction of 4chan as an ‘Internet
hate machine’ and trolls more broadly as an anti-social, foul-mouthed
group of misanthropes, still living with their mothers, etc.,
simultaneously mocked and heightened the moral panic about the anarchy
of the online world.

Other mainstream news media focused on cyberbullying, DDoS attacks and
the trolling of Facebook memorial pages. Author Whitney Phillips was
more ambivalent, characterizing the cultural politics of trolling in
more generous terms than the mainstream press, portioning some of the
blame for their extreme cruelty to Facebook policies and the ‘encoded
solipsism’ of the social network itself. While she recognized the very
real impact of their actions on their victims, Philips described
4chan/b/’s trolls as ‘revel[ing] in counter-hegemony’ and ‘undermining
established media narratives’ and the ‘mindless histrionics of the
modern 24-hour news cycle’. She characterized Fox News’ unflattering
description of 4chan trolls as an attempt to ‘maximize audience
antipathy’ toward them and said ‘mainstream media outlets aim to
neutralize a particularly counter-hegemonic cultural space.’

As late as 2014, when 4chan was full of extreme racist and misogynist
content, Gabriella Coleman wrote in much more positive tones again about
the hacker cultures that had emerged from it:

What began as a network of trolls has become, for the most part, a force
for good in the world. The emergence of Anonymous from one of the
seediest places on the Internet is a tale of wonder, of hope, and of
playful illusions. Is it really possible that these ideals of
collectivity and group identification, forged as they were in the
hellish, terrifying fires of trolling, could transcend such an originary
condition? Did the cesspool of 4chan really crystallize into one of the
most politically active, morally fascinating, and subversively salient
activist groups operating today? Somewhat surprisingly, yes.

Years before the whole 4chan troll culture became a central force behind
the entire aesthetics and humor of the alt-right, it was teeming with
racism, misogyny, dehumanization, disturbing pornography and nihilism.
Even taking into account the complex and shifting nature of chan
culture, it is certainly hard to imagine even a hint of approval being
tolerated in academia if the subjects at hand were ordinary blue-collar
members of the far right like Tommy Robinson, despite his far milder
views than what has characterized 4chan and trolls like weev for many
years. It was the utterly empty and fraudulent ideas of countercultural
transgression that created the void into which anything can now flow as
long as it is contemptuous of mainstream values and tastes. This is what
allowed a culture that has now been exposed in all its horror to be
romanticized by progressives as a counter-hegemonic force. The truth I
think it reveals is that both rightist chan culture and ultra-PC
academic culture understood the countercultural dog whistle of disdain
for anything mainstream.

In a 2016 essay ‘The New Man of 4chan’, I wrote an account of the racist
and misogynist incel mass shooter Chris Harper Mercer, whose killing
spree killed nine and injured nine. In response to a 4chan thread
believed to have been started by him, describing a killing that the
author was going to commit, a commenter wrote: ‘Make sure you got
molotovs. It is really easy and painfully [_sic_] way to kill many
normies.’ Another wrote that ‘Chads and Stacy’s’ should be targeted,
referencing a 4chan meme about the normies. Chad Thundercock and his
female equivalent, Stacey, are embodiments of this normies meme.

I would argue there is a much more critical way of theorizing these
online cultures and it comes from the study of music subcultures. Chad
and Stacey bring to mind the more feminine but similarly frowned upon
‘Sharon and Tracey’ in cultural critic Sarah Thornton’s study of
‘subcultural capital’ in pop subcultures and countercultures. In her
book about club cultures, she wrote:

If girls opt out of the game of hipness they will often defend their
tastes with expression like ‘it’s crap but I like it’. In doing so they
acknowledge the subcultural hierarchy and accept their lowly position
within it. If, on the other hand they refuse this defeatism female
clubbers and ravers are usually careful to distance themselves from the
degraded pop culture of ‘Sharon and Tracey’; they emphatically reject
and denigrate a feminized mainstream.

She criticized what was known as the Birmingham School in subcultural
studies, which produced analysis of subcultures often as radical,
transgessive and counter-hegemonic. She argued that this orthodoxy had
‘been insufficiently critical of subcultural ideologies, first, because
they were diverted by the task of puncturing and contesting dominant
ideologies and second because _their biases have tended to agree with
the anti-mass society discourses of the youth cultures they study.’_
[emphasis mine]. While even critics of the alt-right and rightist chan
culture have found themselves trying to use and ‘get’ its slang and
niche subcultural references and in-jokes, Thornton applied sociologist
Pierre Bourdieu’s concept of _cultural capital_ in her theory of
_subcultural capital_ as the central motivating factor at work in the
club cultures of the 90s. Elite subcultural knowledge or hipness, she
argued, was a form of cultural capital, through which members of the
subculture gain entry. Bourdieu, from whom her term was adapted, argued
that ‘the deep-seated intention of slang vocabulary is above all the
assertion of an aristocratic distinction.’

While cultural capital was once earned through being urbane and
well-mannered, subcultural capital is earned, Thornton argued, through
being ‘in the know’, using obscure slang and using the particularities
of the subculture to differentiate yourself from mainstream culture and
mass society. Thornton argues that the media plays a key role in the
system, through which the subculture gives meaning to what is in or out
of fashion, high or low in subcultural capital. Like many online
cultures, club culture, she argues, polices the boundaries of its
subcultures through constant reclassification of hipness.

The hatred of the shallow, vain, clueless girl with mainstream tastes
trying to infiltrate a geeky subculture has become central to geeky
subcultures. A common trope employed across a variety of geek alt-right
subcultures is that of the girl who is trying to belong to geek
subcultures, but who fails to use the correct markers of belonging, such
as correct slang and depth of elite knowledge.

The entire discourse around ‘normies’ and ‘basic bitches’ who ‘don’t
get’ the countercultural styles of the amoral subculture takes me back
to my adolescent days of rival music subcultures, but now it’s with
grown men and some more serious political stuff at stake. Richard
Spencer regularly accuses those who fail to find the return of race
separatism edgy and cool of being normies and basic bitches. Mike
Cernovich was interviewed by the _New York Times_ and said Hillary
Clinton’s speech ‘was the stupidest thing she could have done’, adding,
‘Her social-media advisers are twenty-four-year-old basic bitches who
feel triggered by us…’ When we’ve reached a point where the idea of
being edgy/countercultural/transgressive can place fascists in a
position of moral superiority to regular people, we may seriously want
to rethink the value of these stale and outworn countercultural ideals.

One can also hear echoes of Nietzsche in some of the attacks on
increasingly feminized mainstream online platforms. Music critic Robin
James wrote that: ‘Nietzsche’s ascription of feminine characteristics to
the masses is always tied to his aesthetic vision of the
artist-philosopher-hero, the suffering loner who stands in
irreconcilable opposition to modern democracy and its inauthentic
culture.’ And John Carey claimed: ‘Nietzsche’s view of the mass was
shared or prefigured by most of the founders of Modern European
culture.’ The online expression ‘there are no girls on the Internet’
appeared early on in 4chan’s ‘Rules of the Internet’. This is intended
to be read not literally but as an assertion that the areas of the
Internet in which there are few or no women constitutes ‘the Internet’,
meaning the authentic Internet. Women are discussed in a way that
presumes their absence, and users seemed to treat the anonymous space as
a place where grievances could be aired against women to a sympathetic
implicitly male audience.

‘Cumdumpster’, a slang term that was popular on the anti-feminist
Internet for many years, has its roots in attacks against women
perceived to be attention-seeking and vain, moving into male-dominated
geeky spaces. As scholar Vyshali Manivannan documented, the common usage
of the term on 4chan originates in 2008 in an infamous incident in which
a 4channer identifying as a ‘femanon’ posted a photo of what looked like
herself in lingerie, almost certainly fake. The woman requested advice
on a recent breakup, asking whether or not she could easily commit
marital infidelity. Her behavior was in such breach of subcultural
conventions that users began editing the post, according to Manivannan,
expressing her interest in excrement and exchanging the word femanon for
cumdumpster. The thread was temporarily fixed to the front page of /b/
and one user deemed it the equivalent to ‘a human head on a pike’, a
clear statement of inclusion and exclusion.

Although it had since become less influential, one geeky online
subculture that started to move to the right and shared many
characteristics of the contemporary alt-right was ‘new atheism’. It was
one of the predecessors to the alt-light, with an underlying Christopher
Hitchens style of hitting out at the irrational and the faithful. All
the ‘Milo OWNS stupid feminist’ type of videos today are made with much
the same style as the new atheist videos that were equally numerous on
YouTube a few years before with titles like ‘HITCHSLAP. Hitchens OWNS
stupid Christian woman’. It also had the same Nietzschean,
anti-mainstream, non-conformist sensibility running through it.

Female ‘new atheist’ Rebecca Watson was the founder of the Skepchick
blog and also cohosted The Skeptics’ Guide to the Universe podcast. Back
in 2011, Watson became the object of a wave of abuse in the online
atheist and skeptic community at the center of an online storm now known
as #elevatorgate. She had written a blog titled ‘Reddit makes me hate
atheists’ about incidents of young women in the atheist online community
being ridiculed for trying to engage in discussion in the largely male
forums. In June of 2011, she was speaking on a panel with Richard
Dawkins. According to her account of the event that led to
#elevatorgate:

I used my time to talk about what it’s like for me to communicate
atheism online, and how being a woman might affect the response I
receive, as in rape threats and other sexual comments. The audience was
receptive, and afterward I spent many hours in the hotel bar discussing
issues of gender, objectification, and misogyny with other thoughtful
atheists. At around 4 a.m., I excused myself, announcing that I was
exhausted and heading to bed in preparation for another day of talks. As
I got to the elevator, a man who I had not yet spoken with directly
broke away from the group and joined me. As the doors closed, he said to
me, ‘Don’t take this the wrong way, but I find you very interesting.
Would you like to come back to my hotel room for coffee?’ I politely
declined and got off the elevator when it hit my floor.

She referred to this incident in a vlog afterwards. As a result, the
comment sections on her YouTube videos were flooded with nasty
sexualized abuse and threats, her Wikipedia page was vandalized and, she
wrote: ‘A few individuals sent me hundreds of messages, promising to
never leave me alone.’ The hate mail was further intensified after
Richard Dawkins himself weighed in, mocking Western feminists for
complaining about such trivial things as being propositioned in an
elevator, when much greater suffering was taking place in the Muslim
world.

Twitter accounts were made in her name and used to tweet incriminating
things to her friends and others. Entire blogs were created about her,
she claimed, cataloguing past mistakes and attempting to dig up anything
incriminating in her past. Just a week after Dawkins weighing in, she
was scheduled to speak at an atheist conference, and a man tweeted
Watson that he was attending and that if he ran into her in an elevator,
he’d assault her.

Hated for destroying a male space with their feminine culture, other
women and feminists in the atheist online community have reported
similar behavior. Watson’s co-blogger, Amy Davis Roth, had to move house
after her address was posted on a forum dedicated to hating feminist
atheists, called Slime Pit. These had been posted by the same man who
had written a scathing post about her on A Voice For Men. Feminist
skeptic blogger Greta Christina wrote that: ‘when I open my mouth to
talk about anything more controversial than Pan Galactic Gargle Blaster
recipes or Six More Atheists Who Are Totally Awesome, I can expect a
barrage of hatred, abuse, humiliation, death threats, rape threats, and
more.’ Similarly, skeptic Jennifer McCreight stopped blogging and
accepting speaking engagements altogether, writing: ‘I wake up every
morning to abusive comments, tweets, and emails about how I’m a slut,
prude, ugly, fat, feminazi, retard, bitch, and cunt (just to name a
few)… I just can’t take it anymore.’

A meme said to have originated from Reddit, in the atheist forum
r/atheism, to show how women use photo-based social media to indulge
their vanity while men do not, showed a cartoon of a male forum user
showing their audience a brick, which appears as simply a brick, while
the female forum user showing the audience a brick appears in a posed
and flattering photo of her holding a brick. In this cartoon image, the
female is more interested in taking a photo of herself under the
pretence of displaying an interest in the object under discussion, while
the male simply displays the object.

This image featured in the r/atheism forum, documented by feminists
critical of the culture of online atheism, when a 15-year old girl under
the pseudonym Lunam, posted a thread called ‘What My Super Religious
Mother Got Me For Christmas’, in which she linked to a photo of herself
holding Carl Sagan’s _Demon-haunted World: Science as a Candle in the
Dark_. The first comment on the image read, ‘Brace yourself, the
compliments are coming’, suggesting the inevitability of the flattery
she would knowingly receive. What followed was a long discussion, in
which commenters discussed her age, and joked about abducting and anally
raping her. ‘Relax your anus, it hurts less that way’ wrote one
commenter. ‘Blood is mother nature’s lubricant’ joked another. When
Lunam eventually responded to these comments, she wrote: ‘Dat feel when
you know you’ll never be taken seriously in the
atheist/scientific/whatever community because you’re a girl’ and the
first critical response returned ‘well if you say things like “dat feel”
…’

This was part of a broader trend within male-dominated geeky online
subcultures whereby women are viewed as a threat to the edginess of the
subculture, instead seen as a force for bringing the moral and
behavioral constraints and the inauthenticity of the mainstream
platforms into the subcultural realm. An early example of the
anti-female geek genre, the ‘Idiot Nerd Girl’ meme, which appeared
around May 2010, featured a photo of a teenage girl wearing thick-rimmed
glasses with the word ‘nerd’ written on the palm of her hand. The upper
caption contained references to ‘geek culture’, while the bottom caption
demonstrates a lack of subcultural knowledge, captioned with things
like: ‘Self-proclaimed title of “Nerd”/What is World of Warcraft?’ or ‘I
love back to the future!/What the hell is a gigawatt?’

Women who find themselves called attention-seeking whores, camwhores and
cumdumspters with regularity in forums that identify as transgressive
and countercultural are usually guilty of slipping up and ‘not getting’
the subcultural conventions. They are seen to display female vanity,
which is violently rejected in chan culture because it is the defining
feature of so much of mainstream social media and online culture, in
which networks such as Instagram and Facebook are based around personal
identity and photographs. It is against these massified and feminized
networks that these subcultures aggressively seek to defend their
borders.

Again, this is nothing new. In reference to John Osbourne’s _Look Back
in Anger_ and _Rebel Without a Cause_, as a similarly gendered attack on
the mediocrity of the post-war social order, Joy Press and Simon
Reynolds wrote: ‘The rebel discourse of the 50s is haunted by the figure
of the matriarch as the chief organiser of conformism.’ In _One Flew
Over the Cuckoos’s Nest_ the rebellious inmate Harding warns against the
evil nurse Ratched: ‘We are victims of the matriarchy here my friends.’
Conformity in this imaginary is feminine and rebellion is masculine.

Misanthropy and misogyny, hatred of the breeding domesticating feminine,
going together in the world of the alt-right is also nothing new. In
_The Sex Revolts_ Reynolds and Press argued that, in the rebel
imagination, women figure as both victims and agents of ‘castrating
conformity’. This link is particularly evident in the concept of momism,
in Philip Wylie’s _Generation of Vipers_ from 1942, a polemic on the
degeneration of US society, engulfed by materialism and shallow
feminized popular and consumer culture. As in the anti-feminist ‘red
pill’ online cultures, the trap of marriage and domesticity was posited
as the enemy in 50s and 60s male rebel culture, and women regularly
played the roles of the counter-revolutionary enforcers of suburban
mediocrity.

The negative association of femininity and mass culture goes back
further again. Literary critic Andreas Huyssen traces it back to _Madame
Bovary_. Written at a time in which the fathers of Modernism expressed
‘an aesthetic based on the uncompromising repudiation of what Emma
Bovary loved to read’, the novel presented an unflattering portrait of a
woman addled by romantic fiction. Huyssen saw the _Other_ of this period
as woman. In the era of the first major women’s movement, he argued, the
enemies at the gate of a male-dominated elite were female:

It is indeed striking to observe how the political, psychological, and
aesthetic discourse around the turn of the century consistently and
obsessively genders mass culture and the masses as feminine, while high
culture, whether traditional or modern, clearly remains the privileged
realm of male activities.

I want to return again to _Fight Club_. 4chan’s original set of 50
‘Rules of the Internet’, which listed ‘tits or GTFO’ and ‘there are no
girls on the Internet’, also lists the first two rules as ‘You do not
talk about /b/’ and ‘You do NOT talk about /b/’, mimicking the first two
rules of _Fight Club:_ ‘You do not talk about _Fight Club’_.

Tyler Durden, the lead character from the movie, embodies the
reassertion of rebel masculinity against the emasculating conformity of
consumer culture and the post-industrial feminized timidity of
white-collar office life. Edward Norton’s character is the conformist,
emasculated, consumerist beta male while his alter ego of sorts, Durden,
is the countercultural alpha because he is free from needing or being
controlled by women. The Pink Soap he sells is made from the
reconstituted fat of women who had undergone liposuction and then had
their fat ‘sold back to them’, which fuses rebellion against consumerism
with a disdain for feminine vanity and crushing conformity – perhaps the
central theme in MGTOW culture. It also constructs a rebel masculinity
that rejects both traditional male roles and pro-feminist new ones as
its anti-conformist antidote.

The rhetoric of so much of the alt-right echoes Durden’s
anti-conformist, anarchic style in the movie, in which he attempted to
wake the conformist drone from his slumber, to red pill himself. Echoing
the rebel masculinity of 60s counterculture and the ideas about
masculinity found on the alt-right, Durden described mainstream
masculinity as:

… slaves with white collars. Advertising has us chasing cars and
clothes, working jobs we hate so we can buy shit we don’t need. We’re
the middle children of history, man. No purpose or place. We have no
Great War. No Great Depression. Our Great War’s a spiritual war… our
Great Depression is our lives. We’ve all been raised on television to
believe that one day we’d all be millionaires, and movie gods, and rock
stars. But we won’t. And we’re slowly learning that fact. And we’re
very, very pissed off.

This has become precisely also the rhetorical tone and style of the
MGTOW movement and the anti-feminist manosphere in general, in which the
absent father is often the basis for further blaming women.

In _Fight Club_, the cuck theme is also there. The narrator, Jack, tells
us ‘like so many others I had become a slave to the IKEA nesting
instinct’ as he sits on the toilet looking at an IKEA catalog. Durden
later asks him, ‘Why do guys like you and I know what a duvet is?’ Like
the online right, it incorporates masculinist and anti-feminist
politics, as well as rebel angst and a rejection of the domesticating,
feminine influence of women. In the discursive style of the new ‘punk’
transgressive online right, nesting is also associated with
pacification, while transgression, pornography and depictions of
violence are employed as its counterforce in online hate campaigns
against women who encroach upon their space.

The pop culture cliché of the _American High School_ movie, which
adapted old archetypes, depicted a social world in which the worst
sexists were always the all brawn no brains sports jock. But now that
the online world has given us a glimpse into the inner lives of others,
one of the surprising revelations is that it is the nerdish
self-identifying nice guy who could never get the girl who has been
exposed as the much more hate-filled, racist, misogynist who is insanely
jealous of the happiness of others. Similarly, the idea of the inherent
value of aesthetic qualities that have dominated in Western pop culture
since the 60s, like transgression, subversion and counterculture, have
turned out to be the defining features of an online far right that finds
itself full of old bigotries of the far right but liberated from any
Christian moral constraints by its Nietzschean anti-moralism. It feels
full of righteous contempt for anything mainstream, conformist, basic.
Instead of pathetically trying to speak the language of this new right
by trying to ‘troll the trolls’ or to mimic its online culture, we
should take the opportunity to reject something much deeper that it is
revealing to us. The alt-right often talk about the mind prison of
liberalism and express their quest for that which is truly radical,
transgressive and ‘edgy’. Half a century after the Rolling Stones, after
Siouxsie Sioux and Joy Division flirted with fascist aesthetics, after
_Piss Christ_, after _Fight Club_, when everyone from the President’s
fanboys to McDonalds are flogging the dead horse of ‘edginess’, it may
be time to lay the very recent and very modern aesthetic values of
counterculture and the entire paradigm to rest and create something new.



CONCLUSION



THAT JOKE ISN’T FUNNY ANYMORE – THE CULTURE WAR GOES OFFLINE


During the period examined in this book, Mark Fisher stood out as one of
the few voices not on the right who had spoken out against the
anti-intellectual, unhinged culture of group hysteria that gripped the
cultural left in the years preceding the reactive rise of the new far
right online. In January 2017, when news broke that Fisher had committed
suicide, those in the same online milieu that had slandered and smeared
him for years responded as you might expect—by gloating.

Stavvers (aka Another Angry Woman), an influential Twitter figure among
what the alt-right call SJWs, had already written ‘Vampires Castle’
sarcastically down as her Twitter location and responded to the news of
his death by tweeting: ‘Just because Mark Fisher is dead, doesn’t make
him right about “sour-faced identitarians”. If only left misogyny would
die with him,’ with the follow-up: ‘*dons vampire cape, flies off into
the night*,’ This response is a fairly typical example of precisely the
sour-faced identitarians who undoubtedly drove so many young people to
the right during these vicious culture wars. The left’s best critic of
this disease of the left had just died and dancing on his grave was a
woman who once blogged about baking bread using her own vaginal yeast as
a feminist act.

There is no question but that the embarrassing and toxic online politics
represented by this version of the left, which has been so destructive
and inhumane, has made the left a laughing stock for a whole new
generation. Years of online hate campaigns, purges and smear campaigns
against others – including and especially dissident or
independent-minded leftists – has caused untold damage. This anti-free
speech, anti-free thought, anti-intellectual online movement, which has
substituted politics with neuroses, can’t be separated from the
real-life scenes millions saw online of college campuses, in which to be
on the right was made something exciting, fun and courageous for the
first time since… well, possibly ever. When Milo challenged his
protesters to argue with him countless times on his tour, he knew that
they not only wouldn’t, but also that they couldn’t. They come from an
utterly intellectually shut-down world of Tumblr and trigger warnings,
and the purging of dissent in which they have only learned to recite
jargon.

The online right in return has become nastier still, with many drifting
so far right it would have been inconceivable just a few short years
ago, to Jewish conspiracies and so on. Wherever you find even the
lightest version of the online right, in forums, in YouTube comments, on
Twitter, you will now also find a deluge of the worst racial slurs
imaginable, vicious commentary about women and ethnic minorities, and
fantasies of violence against them. Inevitably, the Jewish conspiracies
and dehumanizing invective against ‘rapugees’ also follows. Even
conservatives are starting to catch a glimpse of the level of inhumanity
that the culture wars have released on the right. When David French of
the _National Review_ dared to criticize Trump, for example, he first
got attacked by Milo and then the alt-right attack dogs came. He wrote:

There is nothing at all rewarding, enjoyable, or satisfying about seeing
your beautiful young daughter called a ‘niglet’. There is nothing at all
rewarding, enjoyable, or satisfying about seeing man after man after man
brag in graphic terms that he has slept with your wife. It’s unsettling
to have a phone call interrupted, watch images of murder flicker across
your screen, and read threatening e-mails. It’s sobering to take your
teenage kids out to the farm to make sure they’re both proficient with
handguns in case an intruder comes when they’re home alone. The misery
is compounded when longtime friends and allies dismiss my experiences
and the experiences of my colleagues as nothing more than the normal
cost of public advocacy. It’s not. I have contributed to _National
Review_ for more than ten years now, and have been deeply involved in
many of America’s most emotional culture-war battles for more than 20.
I’ve never experienced anything like this before.

Multiple journalists and citizens have described in horrifying detail
the attacks and threats against those who criticize Trump or figures of
the online Trumpian right, especially if the critic is female, black or
Jewish, but also if they’re a ‘cuckservative’. They now have the ability
to send thousands of the most obsessed, unhinged and angry people on the
Internet after someone if they dare to speak against the president or
his prominent alt-light and alt-right fans. Although the mainstream
media is still quite anti-Trump, it would be naïve to think this isn’t
going to result in a chilling of critical thought and speech in the
coming years, as fewer and fewer may have the stomach for it.

In February 2017, before the spectacular collapse of his career, Milo
had planned to give the closing talk of his tour on the campus of UC
Berkley, home of the free-speech movement of the left in 1964. Many have
commented on the irony of the Berkeley riots that took place – the
historical reversal of the left now censoring the campus to cleanse it
of the right – but it is also significant that it was on what was
scheduled to be the final night of his tour. It was on this night, at
the end of a yearlong tour throughout which the US campus left
spectacularly failed to challenge him on the level of ideas, that it
chose to riot. Like the now famous Richard Spencer getting punched meme,
it felt as though a giddy display of momentary muscle provided a
temporary relief from the unfamiliar feeling of relentlessly losing.

Video footage quickly emerged on Twitter the night of the riot of a
young female Yiannopoulos fan being maced in the face, another young
woman being struck on the head with a flagpole and a man lying on the
ground unconscious being beaten by several people while a voice
off-camera screamed ‘beat his ass!’ The glass walls at the ground floor
of the building were smashed, fires were started and Yiannopoulos was
evacuated, canceling the talk. On this night the right was on the
receiving end of violence, but on another, an anti-Milo protester was
shot.

His tour painfully exposed the deep intellectual rot in contemporary
cultural progressivism and it found itself completely unable to deal
with the challenge coming from the right. The problem with the
contemporary style of Tumblr-liberalism and a purely identitarian
self-oriented progressivism that fomented in online subcultures and
moved on to college campuses is that the very idea of winning people
over through ideas now seems to anguish, offend and enrage this
tragically stupefied shadow of the great movements of the left, like the
one that began on campuses like Berkeley in 1964. Milo may be vanquished
but not through a battle of ideas.

The online culture wars of recent years have become ugly beyond anything
we could have possibly imagined and it doesn’t look like there is any
easy way out of the mess that has been created. Suddenly, how far away
the utopian Internet-centric days of the leaderless digital revolution
now seem, when progressives rejoiced that ‘the disgust’ had ‘become a
network’ and burst suddenly into real life. Now, one is almost more
inclined to hope that the online world can contain rather than further
enable the festering undergrowth of dehumanizing reactionary online
politics now edging closer to the mainstream but unthinkable in the
public arena just a few short years ago.

[]

Zero Books

CULTURE, SOCIETY & POLITICS

Contemporary culture has eliminated the concept and public figure of the
intellectual. A cretinous anti-intellectualism presides, cheer-led by
hacks in the pay of multinational corporations who reassure their bored
readers that there is no need to rouse themselves from their stupor.
Zer0 Books knows that another kind of discourse – intellectual without
being academic, popular without being populist – is not only possible:
it is already flourishing. Zer0 is convinced that in the unthinking,
blandly consensual culture in which we live, critical and engaged
theoretical reflection is more important than ever before.

If you have enjoyed this book, why not tell other readers by posting a
review on your preferred book site.

Recent bestsellers from Zero Books are:

IN THE DUST OF THIS PLANET

Horror of Philosophy vol. 1

Eugene Thacker

In the first of a series of three books on the Horror of Philosophy, _In
the Dust of This Planet_ offers the genre of horror as a way of thinking
about the unthinkable.

Paperback: 978-1-84694-676-9 ebook: 978-1-78099-010-1

CAPITALIST REALISM

Is there no alternative?

Mark Fisher

An analysis of the ways in which capitalism has presented itself as the
only realistic political-economic system.

Paperback: 978-1-84694-317-1 ebook: 978-1-78099-734-6

REBEL REBEL

Chris O’Leary

David Bowie: every single song. Everything you want to know, everything
you didn’t know.

Paperback: 978-1-78099-244-0 ebook: 978-1-78099-713-1

CARTOGRAPHIES OF THE ABSOLUTE

Alberto Toscano, Jeff Kinkle

An aesthetics of the economy for the twenty-first century.

Paperback: 978-1-78099-275-4 ebook: 978-1-78279-973-3

MALIGN VELOCITIES

Accelerationism and Capitalism

Benjamin Noys

Long listed for the Bread and Roses Prize 2015, _Malign Velocities_
argues against the need for speed, tracking acceleration as the symptom
of the ongoing crises of capitalism.

Paperback: 978-1-78279-300-7 ebook: 978-1-78279-299-4

MEAT MARKET

Female Flesh under Capitalism

Laurie Penny

A feminist dissection of women’s bodies as the fleshy fulcrum of
capitalist cannibalism, whereby women are both consumers and consumed.

Paperback: 978-1-84694-521-2 ebook: 978-1-84694-782-7

POOR BUT SEXY

Culture Clashes in Europe East and West

Agata Pyzik

How the East stayed East and the West stayed West.

Paperback: 978-1-78099-394-2 ebook: 978-1-78099-395-9

ROMEO AND JULIET IN PALESTINE

Teaching Under Occupation

Tom Sperlinger

Life in the West Bank, the nature of pedagogy and the role of a
university under occupation.

Paperback: 978-1-78279-637-4 ebook: 978-1-78279-636-7

SWEETENING THE PILL

or How we Got Hooked on Hormonal Birth Control

Holly Grigg-Spall

Has contraception liberated or oppressed women? _Sweetening the Pill_
breaks the silence on the dark side of hormonal contraception.

Paperback: 978-1-78099-607-3 ebook: 978-1-78099-608-0

WHY ARE WE THE GOOD GUYS?

Reclaiming your Mind from the Delusions of Propaganda

David Cromwell

A provocative challenge to the standard ideology that Western power is a
benevolent force in the world.

Paperback: 978-1-78099-365-2 ebook: 978-1-78099-366-9

Readers of ebooks can buy or view any of these bestsellers by clicking
on the live link in the title. Most titles are published in paperback
and as an ebook. Paperbacks are available in traditional bookshops. Both
print and ebook formats are available online.

Find more titles and sign up to our readers’ newsletter

at http://www.johnhuntpublishing.com/culture-and-politics

Follow us on Facebook

at https://www.facebook.com/ZeroBooks

and Twitter at https://twitter.com/Zer0Books
